Hollywood stars: William H Macy and wife Felicity Huffman, pictured last week, will be awarded a double star on the Hollywood Walk of Fame next week
In 2005 when Bloomberg was running against Freddie Ferrer he funded another ballot security operation-helmed by Mr. Haggerty-in that race as well. In that case, Mr. Bloomberg made two $400,000 donations to the New York State Republican Party's "Housekeeping Account." In turn, the Republican Party paid $200,000 in "poll watcher" fees to an apparently unincorporated company called Campaign Resources. Located at 205 Montague Street, in downtown Brooklyn, it used the address of the law office of the late Robert Allan Muir, Mr. Haggerty's attorney and friend. In other words, for two consecutive mayoral campaigns, Mr. Haggerty, the officially unpaid Bloomberg "volunteer," was in fact paid very well through unincorporated firms, with funds that had originated in Mayor Bloomberg's private accounts.
6. None of us like Dullface
Cons: Martin Luther King Jr. Day has no food associated with it. A holiday can’t be taken too seriously until it has some sort of food to shove down our throats.
Today is Candlemas: February 2nd in the ancient Celtic calendar signified the half – way point, a cross-quarter day, between midwinter and spring. It’s pretty amazing we’ve lasted thus far: three storms and more threatening; it’s already six weeks since solstice and in another six we’ll have reached the vernal equinox.
Michael Grade was wrong.
It’s 2006, and I think it’s time women stopped being so snobby and acting like they know which are the “right” careers for women. I’m not saying we should all encourage our daughters to be porn stars, but should we really be encouraging them to be bank managers? The point is, the reason it was called “women’s liberation” is that women were trying to liberate themselves from oppressive, mandatory beauty standards, and from oppressive, mandatory ways of fucking, or rather, getting fucked. There’s a world of difference between women only being seen as sex objects, and women being appreciated for their full talents, potential, and, yes, looks—sexuality included. It’s hypocritical and false to claim that we never want that kind of attention, even if you only want it from one person at one time. Part of what the new wave of erotic entertainment has brought is a sense that women can be like porn stars—at home. They can be the perfect schoolteacher or PTA mom or bank manager during the day and come home and be the wild dirty whore in the bedroom . . . if they want to. That last part is vital and essential, because obviously without it, we’re back to those same old pre-sexual revolution standards. But to deny women the opportunity to be who they truly want to be, whether that’s a porn star/sex columnist, or a porn star, or a stripper, or a sex writer, or just someone who’s curious about what’s out there, is patronizing, condescending, and sexist. Do I think there’s room for improvement in the choices women are given in terms of what to look at? Could there be more porn/erotica/adult entertainment geared towards women? Of course. But, just like girls reading Gossip Girl books doesn’t mean they’re taking them 100% at face value, women watching even the filthiest porn doesn’t mean we check our brains at the door. We can make up our minds and our faces and our pussies. We don’t have to do any of those, but we can, or at least, should be able to if feminism is going to continue to be relevant. I’m not saying sex is the only frontier where feminism is relevant; of course it isn’t, but it is one frontier and the reason I harp on this so much is that it also appears to be the frontier most easily attacked by the holier than thous, yet another version of “my sex is better than your sex/you should feel embarrassed/guilty/you should be ashamed of yourself.” Whenever I hear those things, you can bet I take it personally, because it helps create a culture where some kinds of sex are “normal” and other kinds aren’t. Where one or two sex partners at a time are okay, but six is too many. Where you can be “20 times a lady,” but not 80. Where you’re just one step away from being a sex addict.
Earth is a horrible place to live. At least, that’s what I’ve learned from the movies. Anytime an alien life form or God is punished, they’re shipped off to Earth. Usually, it’s to New York City, which is ironic considering how many people dream of making it there. You know what they say; one man’s dream is another man’s nightmare. The punished victim this time is an alien criminal who is being sentenced to Earth for his penalty. Making matters worse, he’s stuck in a human body. Considering most of this blog’s readers are humans, I feel we can all relate. Every day, we wake up in a human body and simply sigh. Our alien antagonist does the same thing. That and he murders people. That’s where the comparisons end (I hope). The alien can only live in one human body for a certain amount of time. Once the body’s time runs out, he painfully transforms back into his alien self. I believe the harm in this is that his alien life form can’t handle the oxygen on Earth without a suitable body of armor. That or if he’s discovered to be an alien, he’s doomed. I honestly don’t remember.
stores user profiles upto 80
This fun parody actually reached #16 in Canada a couple of months later. It was done by Mike Darow (his name was incorrectly printed with two R's on this record's label), who had just started working in 1959 as an air personality for CHUM Radio doing the afternoon (4:00pm to 7:00pm) shift. Garry Ferrier, a very creative copywriter and part-time air personality for the station, wrote the lyrics.
takes the silhouette of a man,
Here is the hallway leading to the children's ministry rooms
2 to 3-inch-long sprig fresh rosemary; more sprigs for garnish
2. What is Mooncake Golden Syrup?
- Machine-washable pad makes cleaning this rocker a breeze!
on the edge of a shelf
February was on the warm side for us, and that in turn led to many overcast/whiteout or stormy days. On one of the better weather days,while on the cold side, I took advantage of the clear skies and sunshine for a trip.
I took time to glance down at our empty slip. Boat's still on the hard because the weather is dictating the painting schedule. I need to spend more time starring at that empty slip to experience what's it going to feel like in the future. We'll race her again before she's done with us, because TW will not accept the first offers she attracts. But it's not going to be the same: she's got her orders.
So I called the number back and the doctor answered:
3) Add soy sauce, cooking wine. Stir well.
After letting the icing dry overnight, I placed two cookies in each cellophane favor bag, and tied them with raffia and custom tags that I had printed out on card stock (similar to the baby shower cookies that I made back in January).
In case you’re not already aware, most of my posts are for the blog Unnecessary Words. Its a blog about a little of everything and a lot of nothing. We would love for you to check it out.
.... your little brother turns 40 than when you do!!! Well, that's what I'm thinking about it!!
Pages: all different
So I wonder why we have a problem with the Turks and no problem with the Japanese, not even in Düsseldorf. Nobody inquires after their birth rate. No authorities are putting interpreters at their disposal. There has not been a summit on Japan — or Asia — with the ministry of the interior. There has been no Christian-Japanese working group on Protestant Church Day. We don’t even know what religion they belong to. They make no secret of it, but they don’t make a big fuss about it either.
Classy to enhance everybody's style such hand made household leather satchel tote, leather-based briefcases as well as buckskin satchels pretty far reaching. Comprising several outstanding styles plus the aged save favorites an example may be sure to currently have one to opt for just about all her weather plus dressed in. Totes this establish an individual's distinctiveness aren't destroyed by way of mere improvement in craze period, they are beautiful. From the kind of favor, what on earth is most critical? Up coming include the classy leather-based totes of which stand up to all of the rage thunder or wind storms.
Movies can and do have tremendous influence in shaping young lives in the realm of entertainment. –Walt Disney
The Messenger - Chapter 1
I forgive myself that I have accepted and allowed myself to live/exist within self disgust towards myself for my own self agreement that I have accepted and allowed myself to live and to continue to live such a self agreement with myself believing and perceiving that I am not able to actually walk in self respect due to all the patterns of abuse that I have created and accepted and allowed myself to participate in as myself as I walk alone.
Houston’s sudden death cast a
Scottish band Holy Esque did their fan base no harm with this fresh set, putting in a well worked performance with tight drum beats and soft synth tunes, and a vocal range echoing that of WU LYF front man Ellery Roberts. Certainly a band to get into.
never need for tears
The commission would recommend a set of changes to safety-net programs and a tax overhaul in hopes of closing the deficit by as much as another $3 trillion. Once that package was adopted, the debt ceiling would be raised again in January 2012…. – WSJ, 7-24-11
All 3 pregnancies have been the same.
But my favorite part was probably Sunday night, hanging out and detoxing and letting go of all the things that had been stressing me out.
I am still waiting on the hatches at the PM (stones, bwo’s, grey drakes, hennies); until then, I think I will keep trying the streamers. Hoping one of these days to hook into something that will actually bend my rod.
"Oh my God! I haven't talked with Mikey since ... let's see ... I've been away on his past five birthdays, but it seems like I asked him if he'd fetch the newspaper from the front drive only a few months ago. No, wait, that was the dog. But there was that day we went to the garage workshop and I showed Mikey how to work the power saw, uh, that was Sally come to think of it.
aand on friday i got invited to another schools homecoming. that's gonna be fun. and next week i have my own. so tomorrow i'm going and getting a mani. plus highlights. can't wait!
A dark shape, silhouetted in shadow, moves amongst the scattered oaks to the east. The form of a red deer stag becomes apparent – russet coat, pale-tipped dark antlers. He meanders slowly beneath the trees, now reaching up, neck gracefully arched, to browse on oak leaves, now bending down to graze. I edge closer cautiously, aware that in recent weeks in Richmond’s sister Park, Bushy Park, several visitors who have foolishly approached too closely have experienced the belligerence of a testosterone-laden stag. But this solitary fellow, perhaps too immature to be clashing his four-pointed antlers for position of dominant male just yet, seems content to stroll nonchalantly amongst the trees. Nonetheless, I keep my distance.
All of this, mind you, was in the absence of perc.ocet. She didn't like how it affected her, but the alternative has been ridiculous.
How Coffee Revolutionized the World!
“Hot town summer in the city
Ha-Ha Bridge (2006) Brian Fell. The final piece of art is significant to me because I like how it is both practical and aesthetically pleasing. I like how both sides function as a barrier and the design is reverse on each side. It is able to look interesting at multiple angles and the design is very slick and clever.
In my house—a true Gryffindor.
Postcard Records: the final stand of the last punk independent also featured heavily in this issue, with words on Vic Godard, The Nectarine No. 9, Jock Scot and Paul Quinn. The back cover had a photo of Vic playing live at London’s Town & Country Club in September 1992.
I added navy blue bias tape to the arm holes and the ruffly sleeves. I think the boldness and the structure that it gives the top of the dress. I had to kind of go stitch crazy on that part because I should have added the sleeves before I stitched on the sleeves, but alas, I didn't and it's a little stitch crazy! Again, who is going to critique the little lady's dress?
1. Reblog the crap out of this post so we get the message amplified.
Once back on land, we headed straight for the tall ship, Elissa. She was built in 1877 and carried cargo around the world for 90 years, before being rescued in Greece and lovingly restored. She now lives in the Port of Galveston, but is still a fully-functioning ship, and sails the Gulf of Mexico annually.
The cake was very cute and the single cakes were spruced up to match.
Alright, well all these great books I have yet to read are calling my name, as is the comfy couch. However, I’d love to know how pleasure reading has been for all of you recently?
Somebody will profit and somebody will loose,but finally somebody will have won a war against the set up money games,and that somebody will be us,all of us.And you,in UK and everywhere in Europe too,no more lies about paying extra taxation to save poor Greeks.
The world is a big fascinating place! I'm struck with this idea that because the world is so fascinating, my kids will find it that way too! I heard an unschooling parent say that history isn't so important, perhaps the words were taken out of context or perhaps the person meant the subject of "history" isn't so important.
Look for realization, read more. Sit and enjoy the view.
When word gets out (way to go, Timmy) that Carla is "home alone" (her parents have gone away for the weekend), the five of them, including Timmy, decide to pay her a surprise visit. After Timmy somehow manages to knock himself unconscious, the drunken quintet proceed to take turns sexually assaulting her in a scene that was off the charts in terms unpleasantness. And just when you thought things couldn't get any worse, Carla's parents arrive home earlier than expected. I don't think I need to explain what happens next–you know, given Carla's recent track record (the gal can't seem to catch a break). But let's just say Carla is not a happy camper when all is said and done.
3 cups cold, cooked rice
“Spring summer collection is entitled WIND. It’s a mixture of vibrant colors, sophisticated fabrics and exotic details, evocative of long, hot summer days. Every woman is unique and I have created my collection to allow each of them to express her own personality through her individual selection and combination of the various styles. The result is affordable, quality fashion that celebrates individuality without sacrificing workmanship.”
I only have one problem, he said.
I rate this a 5/5. The whole book was good, you will laugh, cry and feel everything the characters feel.
A more meditative note.
Maya's relationships really start to get crazy when her genius brother and sister-in-law announce their pregnancy, and then to top it off there’s Jack—could it be love? Who wouldn’t need a coffee break!
Get my new boots on
Row 2-35- ch1, turn, sc in each sc. Finish off.
So, for our Hunter, one might make them more susceptible to Melee, Slashing, Piercing, and Blows, because they are accustomed to fighting from afar. Play around with the settings until you find something that you like!
From my love
This clash is accentuated in the visuals. The train imagery reinforces Night on the Galactic Railroad as well as the idea of a train’s inability to deviate from its tracks, much like one supposedly cannot deviate from one’s fate. Specifically, all flashbacks are shown as destination/arrival tickers, all destinations in the series itself are shown through actual train signs.
When: Saturday, November 15th, 2008
I guess that there is something about me who makes a living as a communicator that wants people to pause long enough to notice and process what is being said. So in that illustration, I think the tiger fascinates me.
So there you are! I loved making these, they looked so pretty and the finished result tasted much better than I would have imagined (and I imagined they'd taste pretty good anyway!) The frosting used was a cream cheese one, something I've mentioned having issues with on here before. But, after ditching the electric mixer in favour of my hand held mixer for this recipe I am a complete convert now! The frosting turned out brilliant, almost nicer than a straight-up buttercream. So, unless I get that fancy £300 mixer for Christmas, I'm sticking to a handheld mixer from now on.
The end of summer is near...and I've been trying to enjoy every minute!
8.- Safety First (f/ Session) - Produced by Tonedeff
On this day in 1900, the Chicago White Stockings played for the first time against the University of Illinois, in Champaign, Illinois. The Pale Hose won 10-9 and Roy Patterson was the winning pitcher.
Stay where God has called you.
Lastly, I decided to liquidate my remaining $DIS calls for a small profit…I think the official scorer ruled it a ‘bunt single’…though the first baseman did appear to bobble the throw. This was an “instinctual” sell…and it looks like I was mistaken, yet again.
Thanks for using our Quick Question service. Hopefully my response will be of some use for you as you proceed with your commercial analysis or marketing report or whatever it is that you’re working on.
Cauliflower-winter crop and they take up too much room
Step Two
Ill-weaved ambition, how much art thou shrunk!
Manicures and pedicures
Halloween is one of my favorite holidays despite the cooling weather. I got to dress up this week twice, since work let us come in costume all week. However, only a few of us did so. But at least I got lots of compliments. Thursday I went as a gypsy and yesterday as a pirate. I cold have dressed up on Saturday when I took my son to the mall for their trick-or-treat event, but I was too tired to mess with changing. We finished in half an hour by skipping the middle shindig. The line was obscene for what he'd be getting. But he was happy with his modest haul anyway, especially the KitKat bar from our first stop. Simple pleasures. :D
MALACHI 4:2
Well now: I have already told you, my, beloved brethren, let no man turn toward us. For what are we? or what are ye? What, but the Church of God which is known to all? And, if it please Him, in that Church are we; and those of us who by love abide in it, there let us persevere, if we would show the love we have. But then the apostle Paul, what evil are we to think of him? He not love the brethren! He not have within himself the testimony of his conscience in the sight of God! Paul not have within him that root of charity whence all good fruits proceeded What madman would say this? Well then: where find we that the apostle asked and did not receive? He saith himself: “Lest I should be exalted above measure through the abundance of the revelations, there was given to me a thorn in the flesh, an angel of Satan to buffet me. For which thing I besought the Lord thrice, that He would take it from me. And He said unto me, My grace is sufficient for thee: for strength is made perfect in weakness" (2 Cor 12:7-9). Lo, he was not heard in his prayer that the “angel of Satan” should be taken from him. But wherefore? Because it was not good for him. He was heard, then, for salvation, when he was not heard according to his wish. Know, my beloved, a great mystery (sacramentum): which we urge upon your consideration on purpose that it may not slip from you in your temptations. The saints are in all things heard unto salvation: they are always heard in that which respects their eternal salvation; it is this that they desire: because in regard of this, their prayers are always heard.
Now for the recipe! Usually I skin the walnuts by boiling them in water for several minutes and rinsing well, but I found the California Walnuts don't need to lose their skins as they are not bitter. You can skip skinning them all together if you are using these walnuts. Most walnut shrimp recipes contain honey, this one does not, hence the simple name of Walnut Shrimp.
My first thought was "let he who has no sin cast the first stone" but then I thought...wait! Having this drink isn't a sin...so that doesn't work. So instead I say, "Judge not, lest you be judged." :o)
What all of this means
Heat oven to 350 F. Oil a 9 x 13-inch pan or 2 8 x 8-inch ones. Layer a third of the sauce in pan(s) (about 2 cups), top with half the tortillas, then another third of the sauce, the remaining tortillas and the remaining sauce.
Each stand has 3 figures and measures 80×40, but the effect is quite chaotic.
The profiles of the founders each include a section on their "Spirit Animal"--Catamount, Jaguar, and White-Tail, respectively. You can find these profiles by clicking on "Tribe" at the top of the page, and then "Creators" (not kidding). "Jaguar", also known as Taylor Thunder, the founder listed (until tonight--more on that later) "Native Americans" among his "Inspirations." It now reads something about his dog. Who is named "Lakota," btw.
Everybody knows that the captain lied
Auch bei Pink {Ink} Sketches gibt es eine neue Challenge heute - und natürlich einen neuen Sketch. Der sieht diesmal folgendermaßen aus:
Dear Heavenly Father, thank You that though we deserve death, You have provided the way to eternal life. Father, forgive us for attempting an offering or sacrifice to make amends for our awful actions. Teach us to always turn to You, and trust that our repentant heart is truly all that You require. May we keep short accounts before You, and keep no record of wrongs that have come against us. By Your love, we are called clean. May our mercy extended to others, offer Your hope that their hearts need to hear. Amen.
I'm feeling very disappointed in myself the past couple of weeks, because I've had to make a tough choice...I love to visit all of your blogs and see what you're up to and to leave y'all a comment to let you know I popped by.
What they failed to mention was that the "SYRUP" has all the nutrition and benefits of ABSOLUTELY NOTHING... and everyone might as well just start an IV line of chemicals and byproducts and HFCS directly into their veins...OH... and go ahead and make an appt with a Diabetes Doctor, Cardiologist, and the Funeral Director...
I made my way downstairs for a few this afternoon to make my card for today's Ways To Use It Challenge 362. Cathymac is hosting today and she challenged us to make a card with "Bountiful Borders". Since I have been working on taking all my old cards off my card rack and refreshing it with new ones, i've started working on Anniversary cards first.
heartwarming like a delicious hot chocolate after a day
Though the military confrontations between Sudan and South Sudan armies have ended, tensions between the two countries have not yet lessened as the two sides are trading accusations of continuing the escalation.
We know the Vatican Library or the Vatican Vault is one of them.
Places must be paid for in advance. To reserve a place contact Victoria at reception at Galway Arts Centre, 47 Dominick Street, phone 091 565886 or email victoria@galwayartscentre.ie
A few weeks ago I had a birthday :) Some time before I had asked my mom if she would come in town to celebrate! She flew in the morning of and we had a wonderful time :) Before we went to pick her up my sweet James woke up and took the girls to get me some breakfast while I showered and got ready in a nice, quiet house (fellow mom's you know what a treat that is :) ) They returned with yummy bagels, flowers and had put out a shirt, scarf and bracelet I had been eying for some time! It was a wonderful birthday morning!
After crying for a minute and grieving along side her for all the change happening and all the loss she's suffered I told myself to buck up. I want her to be able to grieve, but I don't want to scare her by being a basket case. I started to talk to her and tell her how special she is to me. How beautiful. How loved. She started to soften.
The kids did like the book and I'm noticing more peace and quiet
Again, if you’re reading this and you’re from the area, maybe my name has been on the news. I told the shelter that they couldn’t make “Reggie” available for adoption until they received word from my company commander. See, my parents are gone, I have no siblings, no one I could’ve left Tank with… and it was my only real request of the Army upon my deployment to Iraq, that they make one phone call the the shelter… in the “event”… to tell them that Tank could be put up for adoption. Luckily, my colonel is a dog guy, too, and he knew where my platoon was headed. He said he’d do it personally. And if you’re reading this, then he made good on his word.
November 1993 was the beginning of what could be called “The Texas Death Row Occupy Movement.” A plan of action was planned for years by myself and other Texas Death Row inmates to protest an execution date if one was set for certain individuals, namely John “Jazz” Barefield Bey, Sam Miguel, Emerson “Young Lion” Rudd and Ponchai “Kamau” Wilkerson.
18. Mark Shuttleworth, Web entrepreneur, founder of Thawte, distributor of Ubuntu Linux and second fee paying space tourist (1973 - )
We started Thursday evening with dinner at Maya Restaurant & Bar, as I wanted to savor some good southern cuisine. When I had asked for recommendations from people, over 90% of them mentioned Maya. I liked the fact that it was a "made from scratch" kitchen and that they used many local ingredients. It is a casual place, appropriate for families, groups of friends, or even a date, and they also have an outside patio. They have a full bar, and their cocktails average $7-$8, and glasses of wine are generally $6-$8.
That’s exactly what I did and here I am.
The room was really nice even though they were working in the hall and stairways to remodel.
no words to describe my happiness :)
i'm pretty darn excited about this month's shop update
Kevin Haskins: drums.
When are you moving or did you already move?
And, yes, I had been hoping the entire trip that we’d get one good squall so I could use that Shakespeare quote. Nature decided to cooperate on the perfect day at the perfect time.
Are You Suffering From 21st Century Syndrome?
Her diminished size is in me, not in her.
Yet most analysts say that neither Ethiopia nor Egypt wants to go to war over water. “Water wars are not inevitable,” said Dr Gleick. “I’m optimistic that the Nile Basin countries are still negotiating, despite the rhetoric.”
While I've never categorized books into day books and night books before, there are certainly books I have read far into the night. There are also books that I put down at night because they are too scary to contemplate alone late at night. They might not be traditionally "scary", but they might prompt me to think about uncomfortable things, things I don't want to think about at night, like our insignificance in the universe--stuff like that.
There is little chance that Congress will amend the law so as to allow the flow of U.S. taxpayer cash to resume. But those supporting such a move got a boost recently when Comedy Central’s “The Daily Show” did a segment intended to spoof the cutoff. The satire complimented UNESCO’s own efforts to persuade Americans that they are a collection of non-political do-gooders whose efforts are being hampered. But as Claudia Rosett writes in an important piece in The Weekly Standard, the truth about UNESCO is a familiar story for those who follow the world of international non-governmental organizations. The corruption of the agency and, in particular, its efforts in the African nation of Gabon (which was the focus of “The Daily Show’s” skits), serves as a warning of how the world body wastes American money intended for charitable purposes.
Carrie said she took the twins to the mall yesterday to see the Easter Bunny. The girls were so excited to see him and to have their picture taken with him. Perhaps seeing was believing.
I decided to go with 3 different situations: a flaming one, one of strength and a classic mixed with beauty.
“I understand, Bantum, but I don’t want your arm to fall off,” said Hermel.
Start early. All vegetables in a shady garden can benefit from the extra sunlight available before the leaves unfurl and the canopy fills in overhead. I usually start cold-resistant vegetables such as lettuce, broccoli and snow peas several weeks before the last frost date. I plant my other cold-sensitive vegetables, provided the ground has warmed up sufficiently (50 degrees Fahrenheit), as soon after last frost date as I can possibly manage.
These FREE events have been organised in partnership with dgArts. Readings will take place at 7pm in the Gracefield Café Gallery and in most cases will also mark the launch of a new pamphlet by the poet.
Step 14: Application of cold towel on the face
The next week we went back into the village to get pictures of each child that was available for sponsorship and while I was working my photography skills on them, George was asking them 10 questions that I thought the sponsors might want to know about them:
I must say that the whole thing has been more than a little overwhelming but I am sure most of you know what I am talking about. Our laptop has broken and I am really hoping it can be fixed soon so I can regain my blogging life hehe!
I'm terrible, and my notorious bag obsession doesn't help (I obsess over sports bags, that's how bad it is). But I just love me purses.
Birrificio Grado Plato Chocarrubica/Dieu du Ciel Rosee D'Hibiscus
So we haven’t seen or heard from him since then…until tonight. I didn’t even hear her sneak him in. And how can he get by on campus without getting caught by security?
At each day, my love grow stronger. I don't know, it just feels right, it just feels good. I love him so much.
Heart Helper: Unsaturated Fats
Markham ON L3R 6H3
Groom's Attire: He knows exactly what he wants and I agree (all white tux), so it's just a matter of taking him for the fittings.
Encouraging every client to live according to their highest potential is truly a worthwhile endeavor. Think of the people who believed in us, during a trying time in our life…. The work of a life coach is timely in a world that is changing quickly and one in which these changes can overwhelm people. We have the opportunity to give the support that enables people to go forward, without fear and with confidence in themselves.
You can arrange them into a sort of color wheel,
It's quite cute--and utterly endearing. I'm with a man who saves turtles.
I liked the Human Cannonball. It reminded me of a sweeter, fruitier, better balanced and easier drinking Hardcore IPA.
So... here we are, with 2 little cherub, 2 weeks after their second birthday , and they are in little undies! We are so very proud of them and it was definitely alot easier than we expected.
1313 D-IV/22/1999. “’Only the Dean Can Speak for the Dean’.” Memorandum to the Dean and others, The School of Law, Loyola University of Chicago, Chicago, Illinois.
Especially with writing. And even more specifically publishing.
Rating: 6 out of 5
Similar Species No other digest in Southern The u. s. declares shows such a greatly forked longest tail. Shorter-tailed juveniles in trip may suggest the tree digest but will always show partially black chest group and strong guitar neck, bright areas on longest tail.
Sorry I don't have any pictures right now. All my pictures are in limbo. They are on my old hard-drive and then I have some other pictures on two different flash drives, and some on an SD card. I have taken about 1000 pictures in the last week!!! I have been practicing a lot of new techniques and I am loving it!!!! I can't wait to show everyone!!
Now it's your turn! Since we are talking about new beginnings..we are not only having a random winner for each challenge, but we will also now start to have a top 3 picked by a different DT member each week (we are working on getting some new Top 3 Blinkies so be patient with us) so make sure you get your entries in.
One way to ensure that your kids are more of a "pleasure reader" type is to try and read as a family. I have to twist arms and legs sometimes to get this to happen, and I admit that we aren't the picture-perfect family when it comes to read-alouds and family devotionals, but the point is to keep trying!
Paul absolutely adores his baby niece and is so incredibly gentle with her. One of Lise and Bjorn's friends (Tilda's mum and dad) admitted that she was a little trepidatious when she first met Paul but once she saw how careful he was with Tilda she had no qualms when he asked to hold her baby who's just 9 months. I'm glad she let him; it gives him such a confidence boost to know that people trust him.
3” square of slab bacon, diced into tiny cubes (about 8 slices if using pre-sliced)
Jim Corbett National Park in Uttarakhand, one of India’s oldest national parks has now become more technology friendly with the installation of pilot project E eye (electronic eye) by the National Tiger Conservation Authority (NTCA).
Another important point to note in this factfile is that it accommodates his new-found power levels - a 9 out of 10, placing him on par with The Hulk in his entry from this volume. But more importantly clearly observe some of the other values:
The examples I have just cited – I could cite more – highlight what for me is the most sinister and alienating aspect of multiculturalism, not the all too obvious and complete failure of multiculturalism, but rather the huge differences between what people say publicly regarding multiculturalism and what they believe and say among a trusted circle of friends (just like the old Soviet Union by the way). I note for example that many of the people who tell me that “diversity” is a good thing avoid this same “diversity” at every opportunity. They flee the inner city to lily-white neighbourhoods or the shires, they marry whites and they socialise with whites. And outside of work they avoid non-whites at all costs. All very sensible, yet very few will openly admit that they do not want to live among blacks and other non-whites. This is one reason why all government attempts to promote racial mixing in housing – and if any government thought it could get away with it to compel the same – are doomed to failure.
We started corresponding and before I knew it, we became friends, and now I am editing her new fiction manuscript, “Country Heels.” (And I have to say, the rest of the story is as captivating as the sample she has on Amazon right now…)
Woah, my last post was in March. That's pretty bad. Well a lot has changed since then that is for sure. Melanie is now 20 months old and a wild and crazy toddler! She is so much fun now! She loves to play, play, play and doesn't stop until it is time to go to bed! One of my favorite things that she does now is when we pull into our driveway and always says "We're home!" It's too cute! She also loves playing with our neighbors' granddaughter, Logan, who is 8. When she goes out on our deck, she always looks over to their house and yells "Logan!" hehe She's too cute. Melanie talks up a storm. Sometimes I know what she is saying, other times she just babbles. She seems to be picking up more and more words each day. She is also getting really good and putting away her toys when she is done playing. Grant it, I have to ask her but she does it. The other day, she even put her play food back in the fridge, and the dolls and furniture back in her dollhouse. I was amazing she actually but stuff back where it belongs, not just in the toybox.
Descrição: In this lab, you will explore new network management capabilities in Windows Server “8″. You will learn how to implement Network Teaming. You will learn how to implement DHCP failover, and also explore new Windows PowerShell cmdlets for network management.
For simplicity sake, we're going to have all our shadows come from the Sun. We know it is one light above us and shines down, leaving light and shadow in it's wake, but sometimes it can be pretty tricky looking at a flat picture and figuring out how to make it look dimensional using colors and shadows.
3. Drain the noodles and set aside. Take the cooked choclo out of the water and cut the kernels off of the cob. Combine the noodles, cut choclo (and a green veggie if you want), cut ham, and the seasoned white sauce into one pan and simmer for two to three minutes, then serve. :)
Or the worst week could be some week yet to come, when one of us sees something that makes our own compass go off, and turns away instead of acting.
1 grades
By the way, if you want to read a whole host of stories about people's love affairs with band T-shirts, check out the rather splendid My Band T-Shirt blog.
We decided to celebrate afterwards by going to the famous Betty's Tea Shop. I went to the one in York years ago, and remembered its atmosphere of elegant indulgence. I even remember what I ate: a unusual confection of cream, pastry, black cherry and cinnamon. Things have changed a little, it seems.
2. Add the stock, bring to the boil, season with pepper (I don't add salt) and simmer until the veggies are soft.
Though it shares many traditional Korean customs, the story feels very universal. For many people around the world, the last 2-3 generations have lived the great migration from country to city. This story may very well be the story of my own grandparents or the parents/grandparents of millions of people in the world. It is also the eternal story of generational gaps and how modern society can seem so distant from traditions that have been around for centuries. The children in this book, who all lead busy lives in the city, see the traditional ancestral rites of the parents as an almost superstitious practice.
The windows had ugly Auburn blinds that needed to be replaced, so I made faux shades. I found the navy and white striped outdoor fabric at Hancocks and hemmed all four sides to fit the window. I made the length about 18" longer than I needed so that I could draped the fabric across tension rods and then insert the rods at the top of the window. I didn't need the shades to be able to open and close, I just wanted to be able to block out more sun light, so this option is working very well for us.
BF: In any case, the South Koreans told the Chinese that an assassination order was out for me. This was because of my publicly calling for the Asians to stop spending their savings on this vast military machine.
“Awesome!” the woman said.”What a beautiful skirt!”
Simon Mawer’s The Glass Room
Big Sky Brewing Company Powder Hound Winter Ale
As for Steve Whittamore, he isn’t talking to anyone. Ironically, his phone number gives an unobtainable signal – a very recent development, I’m told.
“Satan?”Junsu ask with calm and cold tone.
My best friend that would never leave my side.
These NNN and NNK levels are lower, across the board, than those of moist snuff products from the 1980s and 1990s, which I documented in a review article in 2004 (here). Epidemiologic studies from the 1980s and 1990s show that oral cancer risks among moist snuff users were minimally elevated, if at all, when those higher level products were being used.
friends
We have some new things happening here at Digi Darla's. First, Dawn is now our Sponsor coordinator and she has lined up some great sponsors for us. Plus this is our last bi-weekly challenge. On April 23, 2012, we will be doing weekly challenges.
So, my plan is to have something already in the works and in place to continue to add to it when I can. I've looked at several Pinterest ideas and have some thoughts of what I want, now I just need to put it into place!
This is what brought me to quilting: the ability to share freely.
So when you have the opportunity to choose who works on your behalf as an elected member on your local council please dont waste it!
Homeland: Now that was an episode. Okay, the one where we saw Brody in flashbacks bonding with a young boy and being conditioned to accept a political position but the one where Carrie nearly got blown to pieces was better. Carrie's becoming increasingly the best thing about this show and the closer she seems to get to a result, the more things seem to be going against her. Capturing Tom Walker in this one should've been a walk in the park but apparently not. I can't wait to see what the last two episodes are going to bring for the series.
--cup of hot water
“Linden! Great. Everybody wants to know what happened.”
I also appreciate the struggle of these people who sought a place to live freely, even as they were forced to relocate from ancient tribal lands due to the continual westward advance of European groups, in which I have the majority of my ancestral background. There is evidence that these groups kept hovering in what Europeans considered “undesirable” places: hill country, hollows, mountain ridges, and along narrow stream beds. They traveled from the coastal plain up the rivers to places that we today call Louisa County, Virginia, and later Patrick, and Henry Counties in Virginia, and Stokes, Surry, Rockingham, Wilkes and other Counties in North Carolina, and back to the mountains of Virginia and East Tennessee, some going on over into eastern Kentucky. Through time they intermixed and became lighter and more like their European neighbors. They lost all vestiges of their previous lives. They adopted English names and language and Christian religion.
Radisson Blu Edinburgh were the sponsors of the Hibs v Dunfermline FC game earlier this month. Before the match, we held a competition where the winners would spend a day training with the Hibs team and also won tickets to the match. Our winners were Chad Barclay and Jay Jarvis, who both enjoyed the day. We also held a separate competition with Cramond Primary School where we asked the children to design a Christmas card. The winner of that competition was also invited to the game. Here’s the winning card by Eve Rankin:
2) OR . . . and here's the best part because this little eye pillow is multifunctional . . . stick it into the freezer for two hours to make a coldpress - also great for the eyes.
WOW this past year has just flown by!!! It definitely was a fun year, even though it was overshadowed with the passing of my Stepfather. Nevertheless, I'm extremely excited about all the new and fun things that I'll be doing in *2011*. I have only a few more days till I have to go back to work...yikes!!! The girls and I have been busy going to the movies, ice skating and shopping. All the fun things girls like to do!!! I actually thought I'd have more time stampin' while I'm off, but I guess I was only wishful thinking...LOL!!!
It wasn’t long before a few of them decided to cross the road and engage us in debate. One of them was particularly aggressive, and after unsuccessfully trying to intimidate a few activists on our side, he was laughed back across the road where he sulked behind a placard for the remainder of their ‘protest’. Another fundamentalist Christian attempted to explain the scientific basis behind the story of Noah’s Ark, claiming there was ‘no evidence’ to support evolution. Perhaps the most shocking though, was a woman who came over with her placard to engage with us. When confronted with difficult questions, she astonishingly suggested that women who fall pregnant as a result of being raped should see it as “a blessing”, and carry the child to term. Needless to say, this comment wasn’t very well received.
There are four primary motivating factors for graffiti vandalism, those are fame, rebellion, self-expression, and power.
Firstly the sidepod forms the main blockage to the rear wing and diffuser. We’ve seen several approaches this year to manage the airflow around the sidepods to the rear of the car. In each case the team are trying to get the best and most direct airflow to the top of the diffuser and beam wing. As the better flow these devices receive, the more downforce they produce and the less drag is required from a larger rear wing.
Now we are going crazy about getting tickets. You won't find any information about how and where you can get tickets for this concert. The only thing we know is they will hold the concert at Tempodrom in Berlin. So we have to wait for new information. I think I will go crazy while waiting for the tickets will be sold. x_x
Here is my predicament…
the bigger the gap between what’s working & what’s meant as working, the bigger the density of illusion
1 devour
There are a lot of things in this life that I don't get. Like breathing. I know we have to do it. I know we don't have to think about doing it and our bodies will just get on with it but I really don't get it. And that goes for a lot of things in my life. I get ideas and I write about them. Mostly I write poems; occasionally novels. I can't say that I've not pondered where the ideas come from but never for very long. Sometimes the ideas come while I'm sitting on the loo (quite a common one for me) or two minutes after I've slipped in between the sheets at night and I have to get up to write them down, otherwise I won't be able to sleep. They come in the middle of TV programmes, whilst having sex (once anyway), first thing in the morning on the way to work, in cars, on buses, whilst shopping, in meetings. I've always thought there was no logic to any of it and simply accepted my role in the proceedings: when the ideas come do something with them.
Hi everyone. Its time to announce the winners of our last challenge. Thank you all for playing along during the busiest and craziest time of the year. It was wonderful and nothing short of interesting reading your journalling about how you all spend Christmas time.
Thanks to everyone who played our Gate-Fold Rebel Challenge! The ways you interpreted the format were wonderful!
And what if Lupe was dead, or didn't feel like showing up? We'd brand a man a pedophile for life, making it so he can't work any job, or maybe has to live under bridge like the ones in Florida — all for nothing. Meanwhile, 75% of children who are raped are raped by family members… Way to go, tax dollars.
Severn Trent. This started life as an amalgamation of 20 or so public sector water authorities, one of which was Montgomeryshire. One of the original counties of Wales and now part of Powys. They also own reservoirs in Wales.
Through it all, he maintained a quiet dignity and grace that was inspirational to me, and through it all his wife kept her faith, her sense of humor and her compassion -- and never once became bitter despite this terrible curveball that life threw at their family.
** own a custom bike **
That risk was explained in something a senior Special Branch source once said to me. “Every time we use a source, we take a bit of their life,” he said.
Iván Meade - What does it feel like to be announced as one of Top 20 Young Designers in America by Traditional Home?
I used the My Memories Suite software which I have found to be very easy to figure out and use! I love doing the paper piecings, but I have to admit that digital is quicker, and fun, too :-) BUT, and this is a big 'but', I have not printed any of my creations yet.
So goes things today the need for Jesus is great the return for Jesus is imminent . I couldn’t see, hear or feel my need and couldn’t understand why anyone would want anything to do with God 7 years ago yet now I cant see why everyone doesn’t get it???
For my non-awesome bloggy friends who think that the proper name for soccer is “football,” this is about American Football. The best sport. The sport of Jesus. (I mean, why do you think he had 12 disciples? 11 man roster, play both ways, sub the quarterback on defense, and Jesus coaches. It's in the Bible. Look it up.) (Oh – and for you sick Canadian fucks who think hockey is the best sport, it's worse than baseball on TV. It's sad that the game is designed so poorly that you have to have a light tell you when people score. It's fucking awful.)
I also substituted 1 teaspoon of vanilla bean paste instead of the 1/2 teaspoon of vanilla extract called for...and my Greek yogurt turned out to be fat free, which I didn't notice until I was throwing the container away and the cupcakes were in the oven. *Shrug* - nothing to be done about it at this point. Hoped they'd be okay.
The idea behind the programme is to ‘catch’ potential gifted students when they are still young in the hope that they will remain in Singapore and contribute to the nation in the future. The number of foreign scholars who leave Singapore for good in search of greener pastures elsewhere each year like Mr Liu remains a mystery to this very day.
Next time, it’s all about collage and hardware. Stay inspired!
It was quite amazing to see this little echidna, its quills quivering as it breathed heavily in its hidey hole. We left it alone of course, quietly retreating back out of the forest with our mushroom pillage.
*ponders*
These are protein, vitamin A, vitamin B12, vitamin D, calcium, iron, zinc, and essential fatty acids. Furthermore, pregnant women, growing children, and people with certain health conditions have higher requirements for these nutrients.
today on my ipod: time (hootie & the blowfish), long day (matchbox twenty), all over you (live), turpentine (brandi carlile), romeo and juliet (dire straits), doctor my eyes (jackson browne), i'm yours (jason mraz), surrounded (chantal kreviazuk), kitchen song (edwin mccain), running to stand still (u2), wantin' her again (ben kweller)
My trip to the Caribbean was truly amazing and memorable. One of the reasons why it was so memorable was because anything and everything that could happen to me, HAPPENED TO ME, good and bad. All in all the trip was really fun but unfortunately for me and only me, I got a bad case of sunburn/sun poison after the trip to the Caymans. That along with motion sickness did not help. For those that have not experienced this you do not ever want to. I had nausea, blurry vision, and loss of appetite all at once. Luckily I only started to experience these symptoms the last few days of the trip.
- that the sound of a banana pulled from the bunch will bring you running from any corner of the house;
... and the best book for building your online presence.
So, here is some of what I brought home with me! I have succeeded in twisted Mr. Confessions (somewhat rubber) arm into making this a "couples" project so that we can work on it together. He is a very handy handyman in just about anything wooden, nailed, glued, measured, or otherwise to do with building, so why not use his talents for something miniature too! The table was one sale and too shabby chic to leave behind, and yes, that really is a Starbucks cup on the left edge of the table!
Another specialty of the restaurant was the roast baby lamb. I’ve never had lamb served with the skin before so I wasn’t sure what to expect. The skin and the meat was both soft and juicy and strangely enough tasted just like chicken. The meat was chewy and lots of it fell right off the bone. It also lacked much fat and so displayed every quality I would expect of roast chicken…except the meat smelt like lamb. This caused a massive conflict in my mind, but nevertheless it was still a tasty meat dish.
Of course, a degree is only a piece of paper, the value we assign to it is entirely subjective
Cracks open with the usual fare, the head disappears as quickly as smoke after a magicians arrival leaving it looking like Chardonnay. The nose, well at best "sulphurous" but more accurately it smells of farts.
Ooooo I'm so so excited... my submission for the 'They draw and cook' holiday competition has been listed on the website today, and it has also been picked as today's favourite recipe! (yippeeee!) so it is also featured on the food network blog - the FN Dish
Movies, TV shows, and made-for-TV movies are visual. The scripts are primarily parsed into two categories – dialogue and action. The dialogue is not stale and typical; it reveals the characters, the conflict, etc. Just like in a novel. The action shows us the movement that occurs within the movie.
Assistant Minister of Culture and Heritage Liwan Lagang said such contributions in the form of ideas and suggestions were vital to help the government to tackle the community’s issue effectively.
The issue of Coal Seam gas has currency because it’s part of an ongoing saga.
And my lost life again to-day,
"PUT ON YOUR COAT!" I yell as my teenager is about to leave. "You're hoodie isn't warm enough for today!"
It might be he just looks at then and say something to please me but the other day he commented on the cheese cloth how much he liked when I used that on my cards.. so maybe he IS looking at my cards and not just glimpsing and mumbling a few words to please me..
L’Aquila is nestled in the central Apennine Mountains, which run the length of Italy like a spine. The mountains are crisscrossed by dozens of faults, or cracks in the Earth’s crust. The earthquake appears to have occurred along one of the faults in this area. Faults are not always visible at the surface, but in this part of the Apennines, many of them are revealed by steeply sloped fault scarps (bluffs or cliffs that trace the path of the underground fracture). A major fault system is revealed by a scarp running north-northwest from the Focino Plain nearly to L’Aquila, passing along the eastern foothills of Mt. Velino and Mt. Ocre. L’Aquila is wedged between a pair of parallel faults running toward the northwest and a long, broken fault extending toward the east. NASA image created by Jesse Allen, using SRTM data provided courtesy of the University of Maryland’s Global Land Cover Facility. Caption by Rebecca Lindsey. Instrument: Space Shuttle – SRTM. Image acquired April 6, 2009.
Comment #854 - Dreena (confirmed)
Gillian Welch
I Painted them cream and recovered the cushions with a $4.98 shower curtain from Target. (I added some clear vinyl to the seats also to protect them from the many spills that will be in their future.)
Peel and slice the carrots in slightly smaller bits than the potatoes.
Claire bit her lip. The man obviously didn’t wish to reveal what the letter said. She changed the subject.
(102) If a sign identical with, or similar to, the proprietor’s trade mark is to be ‘used’, within the meaning of Article 5 of Directive 89/104 and Article 9 of Regulation No 40/94, by a third party, that implies, at the very least, that that third party uses the sign in its own commercial communication. In so far as that third party provides a service consisting in enabling its customers to display on its website, in the course of their commercial activities such as their offers for sale, signs corresponding to trade marks, it does not itself use those signs within the meaning of that EU legislation (see, to that effect, Google France and Google, paragraphs 56 and 57).
I’ve done everything for you
3. Autumn Leaves
Thanks Lee for this wonderful opportunity to cased you.
These local artists are calling for some restrictions against international artists. If I’m not mistaken, they want to limit the number of international concerts in the Philippines annually or raise the fees that these international artists pay whenever they perform here. They are claiming that the local industry is suffering because of the success of the international artists’ gigs and they need the help of the government so they can compete and level the playing field. Do I really need to say that I totally disagree with this? I mean I get it, I’m a Filipino and I would support the local industry as much as I can but no one could force me to alter my preferences. If I like a local group I would support it, if not then I won’t. The government should stay away with this for two reasons. First, the Philippines is showcased whenever an international artist comes. It’s good for tourism since these popular artists could make some testimonials about their stay in the Philippines. And lastly, and more importantly, the government should stay away from this issue because it’s all about business and individual choices! It’s fair competition, is it the fault of the international artists if Filipinos prefer their music over the local ones? And the answer to this is government regulation? So what then would our local artists say if they perform abroad and their host country demands more than what they should be giving? What will they say if their host country say that they should pay twice or thrice than what they usually pay to just perform? Yes, the local industry is really affected by this influx but government intervention is not the answer, probably they can just offer the mass some better alternatives or options. The local industry should not invoke the state to act in behalf of them, for it could lead to undesirable outcomes in the future.
Heimat: an unparalleled achievement
I promise you, everything will be just fine
I'm sitting here watching the Biggest Loser. Something about this show always makes me want to just pack up what I'm doing and go to the gym. How could you not feel that way when you are watching people transform their lives...
By the technique ourselves created.
I keep it pretty simple (mostly because I like simple) and start by frying up my corn tortillas in oil. I then grate up my cheese, in this case pepper-jack. I like to use plain or home-made tomato sauce (see below) in my prep and give my hubby home-made salsa to top off his meal as I serve it to him. The final ingredient is fried egg. One of the big tips I can give here is to NOT over cook the egg. When I go to turn my egg I am very careful to turn it gently and not break the yolk. I also make sure it does not get crispy on the edges.
9. You Are An Experiment
i’ve been trying to figure out how i want to write this post.
Ribbon from Joy Crafts
At this point in the bedtime game, John and I are exhausted. The kids however, are refreshed and renewed, having just eaten, exercised and freshened up their mouths. They have absolutely no interest in going to sleep. Max is full of ideas to taunt Jack, and he is frequently darting out of his room into Jack’s to harass him. Jack screams, Max giggles and runs back in his room, and John bellows, “MAX GET BACK IN BED! JACK STOP SCREAMING LIKE A GIRL AND GET FINISHED PLAYING YOUR RADIO GAMES!” Radio games is what I have dubbed Jack’s nightly ritual of scanning every single FM station in an attempt to find the radio station he had the night before. I have repeatedly asked him why he doesn’t just leave the knob where it is night after night. He swears that he doesn’t change the channel, it changes itself. Maybe Max does it, I don’t know, but every night Jack has to re-find his radio station, and it seems to take him FORFREAKINGEVER. His preferred channel is a sports talk station which comes in very staticky but doesn’t seem to bother Jack at all. He turns it up nice and loud to combat Max’s radio across the hall which is blaring love songs from the 80’s and 90’s. For some reason, Max listens to 101 the Rose. Actually, he doesn’t really listen to it; he has his iPod in his ears when he goes to bed. I pointed out that he doesn’t need a radio on if he is listening to his iPod, but he says he does. And by that point, I am too tired to argue, because I still need to tuck the girls in. The girls share a room and sleep in the same bed, so that can cause a fair amount of drama. Most of the time they giggle and talk for a long time after being tucked in, but sometimes they fight. The girls always have lots of requests when we tuck them in. Lucy always tells us that she left her baby doll Grace downstairs. John or I will go down and search for Grace while the other one remains behind, trying to speed up the tucking in. The girls suddenly become thirsty, or they are hot/cold and need to change their pajamas, or they want to wear socks in bed, or they don’t want to wear socks in bed, or they need some lotion or have a headache or want to pick out their clothes for tomorrow. By this point, John and I have no more patience or parental love and we pretty much tell the girls to zip it and go to bed. And then we try to sneak back downstairs, but Jack has a 6th sense about where we are in the house and always yells out a few final requests just as we are almost down the stairs. Then, and only then, are we free to have some alone, adult time. And by alone adult time, I mean we watch something we DVR’d and John usually falls asleep.
Bottom 3: Hollie, DeAndre, I DON’T KNOW WHO ELSE
I am slowly pulling up my bootstraps and putting one foot in front of the other. Saying that always makes me sing the song from claymation classic "Santa Claus is Coming to Town"
Do you have any plans to feature and her mum in any future books?
150g frozen broccoli
3. bake for 25-30 minutes, until golden brown and a toothpick inserted into the middle of a muffin comes out clean. serve warm & with butter.
“With growing cases of divorce among couples, the state has reached an unenviable record in the country. In any social gathering and various fora, the most common discussion in the metropolis is the growing rate at which divorce is taking place,” said a February article in the Nigerian newspaper Leadership.
This happened before and I tried to talk him through it on the phone and then went to do it for him. I got there and he was reduced to tears that he couldn't do it himself!
Place a colored piece of 12" x 18" paper at each child's place.
I chose lemon curd and clotted cream to accompany my scone, and whipped cream and jam were also offered. I couldn’t believe they were served in disposable plastic cups, with all the beautiful china on the table, but they were so good it was completely forgiveable. Rebecca mentioned that it was “the best lemon curd you’ll ever taste,” but I often have doubts when something is declared “the best.” She was not exaggerating! The tart, sweet, and smooth aspects were in perfect balance — not too much pucker.
The days ahead require your persistence and perseverance in the holding of your vision of what you want to see manifest in your World. There are the visions for your personal life and then there are the greater visions of the World you want your children and grandchildren to enjoy and embrace.
And the truth is, I don't know. Anymore. I really don't know what I believe.
Bob blamed the foreign influence on our modern game but did concede that the NHS was stretched enough as it was without weekend influxes of football-related injuries.
I imagine him playing baseball or soccer, all legs and arms flying about the field; maybe he prefers science, loaded down with books and a chemistry set; perhaps he’s more into the arts, sculpting with modelling clay or writing comic books. But then again, possibly I presume too much; maybe he is not playing sports, not discovering new things, and not creating new realities.
Self-importance is the first step down the slippery slope of what we call success. It begins when we claim credit for God-given victories and modify His commands to suit our desires.
Humanity is in a hopeful transition of change. It’s sunlight to our souls.
Any suggestions, if they continue to miss out my bin?
Three Floyds The Creeper (Doppelbock) 9%
It’s not enough for conservative consumers to avoid cowardly businesses that cave to Van Jones and company. Beating back the anti-ALEC mob means getting ahead of them.
9. Crown Royal bags are meant to be thrown away.
(In the form of a list, cause some things will never change)
I managed to read 2 full books — Shadow, by Michael Morpurgo and Distant Shores, by Kristin Hannah — as well as about 100 pages or so more of The Historian, a book I started to read during the Bout of Books readathon two weeks ago (and, yet, I’m still not halfway through it!). I was hoping to get around to reading The Secret Garden today, but thought my time would be better spent continuing The Historian, since it’s been quite a few days since I’ve read anything from it.
This could work for all ordinances in the Temple, and save the difficulties in finding, keeping, filing, etc, the current papers held by so many LDS genealogists.
2:19 pm. ”Call me old-fashioned, but I like to knit with things I can make in my basement.” I can sympathize, but I would add other rooms of my house to this list, such as living room and kitchen. And specifically subtract anything that comes from a lab. Although I do sort of like to have a bit of nylon in my socks because it’s so strong.
I've been listening to the talk on the forum, one of the threads all about which of our romantic leads, who both struggled in childhood, had it harder or more painful. The son of the celebrity quietly struggling to live up to his father's regard and dealing with brutal bullying vs. the girl ignored and marginalized by a mother who left her in the care of others most of her life.
That’s right, $200 for you!
At around 5:3oPM – after some waffling (wait for B-17 or try later?) and a quick call to Jeff (a local pilot) – I was off to the north end of the runway and a 20 minute wait.
It sounds a bit formulaic, but you would be wrong in thinking this film makes no demands of its audience. It does. Mainly when it comes to the suspension of their disbelief. Very early on, there is the following exchange -
Stevia
5. My favourite food at the moment is/are Daim McFlurrys :D
Malika Zarrar: Agree?! What is this audacity? There is no shame left!
If I do not finish a book I may or may not write an explanation for DNF-ing. These explanations are different from standard reviews and will state that I did not finish the book, what page I read up to, why I did not finish, and if I plan on ever picking up the book again.
From Geldolf, Bono, Blair, the G8, various NGOs and so on, these people, unelected by Africans, claim to know what is best for Africa. This moral posturing gives them credibility and status, gives them the ‘feel-good factor’, even though they may do little or nothing in return.
I am sending this e-mail in my name but I trust you will respect my anonymity.
“Who are you and what do you want?” Tanner shot back.
The process begins and you are now being transformed. A seed is planted by you because your confession of sin to God, asking to be transformed through Him. The seed implants itself and now you are now seeing with your spiritual eyes and not the eyes of the flesh. Your vision is, God’s vision. You want to do what’s pleasing to Him. You want to do what is loving and truth to Him. You are implanting scriptures through His blood. His blood is now flowing through you. You are not your own. Then your sight is being renewed and you see clearly. God has given you a vision. That vision is love. Because when you love you are truthful. When you are truthful you move away from sin. It becomes distant and you become closer to God’s vision. Oh, my did you hear that?
#1. Abita Restoration Ale
To my mind, it is no small coincidence that Farmor died just a short time after all of her children, Ove (Kevin’s father), Uncle Egil and Auntie Mia visited her bedside. I believe it was a gift from God that they were all together one last time.
I really like the Weekly Affirmations feature, these are sets of quotes which are empowering and very much inspiring it’ll never leave room for negative thoughts on your mind. I also like the “I’m grateful for” box at the right lower part, it’ll definitely make you feel so blessed every week.
A Japanese fishing vessel swept away during the Class III 2011 Tohoku Zulu Outbreak was spotted 170 miles off of Canada by an air patrol craft. No attempt was made to board the boat and inspection from the air provided no signs of life. Upon discovery the United States and Canadian Coast Guard immediately quarantined the ship. It was later sunk by CF-18 Hornets out of CFB Comox, British Columbia. It is unknown for certain whether or not it harbored infected.
Heat a medium saute pan (one with a lid) over medium heat. Melt 3 tablespoons of butter, then add the endive, pears, lemon juice and zest, and season the whole thing with a good pinch of salt. Stir to combine, then cover and reduce the heat to medium-low. Cook, stirring occasionally, for 20-25 minutes or until the endive is tender throughout. Remove the cover and continue cooking until there is some browning on the pears and endive, another 5 minutes or so.
I came across the Killarney Plaza Hotel. I asked the receptionists if they knew when to bike place opened. They didn’t. I then asked if I could use a bathroom to change. They directed me to the health club.
This is the track workout that almost didn't happen.
One of the key advantages of a S.O.L.A.R. insurance arrangement is the availability of potential supplemental retirement income through the use of policy loans. However the use of loans carries a financial risk; if the policy were to lapse outstanding policy loans most likely will become taxable income, a risk we all would prefer to avoid.
Puddles of water in the Fall,
(Japanese) Good bye.
Fast forward...
After a while, there still was no sign of her. No glow just below the mountain horizon. I know this place very well and found myself becoming impatient with waiting. I know where to expect her, so where was she?
So, let me first talk about what went wrong. Most of my buddies agreed that Gopal should have gone ahead with Aarti, by promising to change himself and the entire education scene. After all, she was the only reason for his existence. But, when I stepped in to a writer’s shoes I realized that it was required, probably the way it was delivered should have been altered. During Gopal’s realization on page 266 and 267, there should have been a more compelling event or a pay-off (which was set-up’d earlier) because this was the most important point in the book.
After days of rain, the day of the party brought cloudy skies, slightly chilly weather and a super muddy backyard. The party that was supposed to be outdoors was brought inside. Seventeen excited fairies and some of their parents made for quite a cramped, yet cozy party.
Condoleezza Rice-She was so good they named her twice
Blah, blah, blah... we've heard this all before... moving on, nothing to see here...
So you also must consider yourselves dead to sin and alive to God in Christ Jesus. Let not sin therefore reign in your mortal body, to make you obey its passions. Do not present your members to sin as instruments for unrighteousness, but present yourselves to God as those who have been brought from death to life, and your members to God as instruments for righteousness. (Romans 6:11-13)
To keep up their courage.
Red Box For America UK
On top of the sweet song, our waiter brought Barbara TWO free desserts to share with the rest of us, equipped with candles. I should note that the desserts we were served were desserts off of the menu and not just a generic Disney cupcake. Next time, I might just go back and get this dessert it was SO good.
Total weight gain: -.5 (I don’t really know how I lost weight. I’m attributing it to the fact that my preggo body seems to only want foods that are at least semi healthy – I haven’t wanted peanut butter m&ms, cookies, or chocolate in weeks)
Melt the marshmallows in a bowl in the microwave. It takes me usually about 2 or 3 minutes in 30 second intervals. Dump the marshmallow bowl into a bowl with the powdered sugar. Mix the powdered sugar with the marshmallow with a spatula greased with Crisco.
Last night they played every song from their album with tons of energy and smiles, and I have to say that they did a fantastic job. I am incredibly proud of them for all they have accomplished and it is really nice for me to be able to see them grow as musicians. I started watching them play about a year and a half ago (in October 2010). In that time, they have expanded their fanbase, written more songs, and created an awesome album. They’ve also somehow become more talented (never saw that coming) and they’ve made live performances even more fun than before. I love to see people that I care about loving what they do, which is exactly what The Little Black Dress does. You can tell by watching them on stage that they are completely in their element and love what they do, which makes me happier than you could ever understand.
The colours of the trees and hedges in the foreground were thrown into startlingly sharp relief by the soft, misty backdrop. The rain had now subsided enough for me to get out of my car, but still in my work clothes, I was starting to get a little wet from the drizzle and I was trying my best to prevent it from getting on to the lens.
Yep, i spent the night in hospital with a kidney stone. Not fun! Doctors orders..Hubby's orders.. to take it easy for this week. SO i might just spend a few days in bed....
The age of hollow legged boys, tired in the morning but can stay awake all night type of boys.
If you thought Atheists and Agnostics and Pagans were evil wait until you met these modern-day murderers, then you would REALLY MEET EVIL!
Six little fuzzy globes, six hairy chapters. At least it's not a delicate bonsai ...
Beat butter in a bowl until soft. Add egg, agave, milk and vanilla; beat until combined and smooth. On low, beat in the flour. Stir through choc chips. Bake in oven at 180 degrees in a lined pan for 20/25 minutes. Eat from the pan...warm and gooey..
Seen hints behind smoked glass,
You see, someone may ask for something they feel they need in their lives but God may have other plans. I do not and will not presume to pray to God with any specifics because only HE is all-knowing, only He is all-powerful and only HE knows the plans He has for their future and mine.
Don't get me wrong. I'm not giving up on inclusion as a longer-term goal for her. I hope for her to have a plan for inclusion in her next IEP. But I no longer long for her to be in a regular pre-school class. Kendall's happy where she is. And I'd like to keep it that way.
bye for now!
Note that Sam’s reaction is an actual effect obtained from being around celebrities. Go to a celebrity, ask them to say the name of a country or city and watch the results.
Holger Danske is the man who best represents us. He’ll be there in the hour of our greatest need.
"Kind of cool, actually, " I said. "I feel like I am invisible.
Because I know this and cannot escape it even in a world of my own creation, the conflicts in my books tend to be less clearly defined. Of course I have heroes and villains, but the villains are not always dastardly ones, though my other characters may perceive them as such. The villains are the heroes of their own story, and though a corporation is often the villains’ vehicle, my heroes don’t bring it down.
I think I'd be right in saying that the Feelgood Corp. still owns this whole parade of shops.
“If the world has not come to its end, it has approached a major turn in history, equal in importance to the turn from the Middle Ages to the Renaissance.”
10And it shall be, when the LORD thy God shall have brought thee into the land which he sware unto thy fathers, to Abraham, to Isaac, and to Jacob, to give thee great and goodly cities, which thou buildedst not,
‘Je Me Perds’ kicks the final chapter of the album into life just as you’re starting to wonder if the light had gone out. Standing at 1.28 its a short and not at all sweet kick to your ears.
RSBY scores over the UID model because its smart card can function as effectively offline. Swarup, who has publicly debated with Nilekani on this issue at several forums, points out that developing countries like India need an offline system to be fully functional since real time connectivity is a long way off.
We can’t agree on what psychogeography means but we all like plants growing out of the side of buildings, looking at things from new angles, radical history, drinking tea and getting lost; having fun and feeling like a tourist in your home town. Gentrification, advertising and blandness make us sad. We believe there is magic in the mancunian rain.
That is how marketers got everyone in their underwear to add QR codes to their marketing mix. You need it, everyone’s doing it, see? The reality?
Then something happened. Puberty. My musings about pets and family and old ladies with Bibles on the bus were replaced by diary entries about the cute boys at school. These were replaced by notes passed to friends in class, which were replaced by talking on the phone and painting my nails and seeing Titanic in the theaters four times. I remained a good student in school, but recreational reading and writing took a backseat. Time was short and I simply had better things to do.
Joseph Harker gives us Reverie Fifteen: Translation Ruling the Nation, which offers us several options playing with other languages, to include the possibility of inventing our own. Go on over to read the whole.
I would like to thank first of all 'creativegranny' for sending in these beautiful Squares. The centres are just so pretty. It's amazing how different a Square can look when you use a variety of colour combinations. 'creativegranny' certainly has a way with colours! These Squares are really nice and will look great in a Blanket for the Elderly.
All money earned counts toward qualifying for the 2010 PBR Built Ford Tough World Finals, and all points count toward the world title race.
Chelsea will be in trouble versus Bayern however, as much of their back line will be suspended from the game. You can bet though, that John Terry will be doing everything he can from the sideline.
There are also some convenient editing during that same episode where Lelouch is shown to have escape and is in the sewer, meeting up with C.C after Cornelia decided to retreat without showing what happen in between. Won’t that be a good chance to showcase how smart he is by showing us the technicalities on how the did that? Actually fuck it, how about showing us how smart he by solving the pinch when he is asked to eject from his cockpit instead of letting C.C magically appears and solves everything?
Faction: Originally Erudite, chooses Dauntless
They say that working mothers of young children (and no doubt fathers too if they do it right) are great multitaskers, I would hypothesize that it is the ability to get everyone out of the house every day that hones these skills. I know that if we have a good morning, I'm flying for the rest of the day. Any couple who can get two kids dressed in clean attractive clothing, each with a healthy lunch, out of the house smiling and cheerful, are ready to tackle anything the day can throw at them.
Dissention in the ranks: Hillary Clinton states that she will not serve another term in Obama’s cabinet if he is reelected in 2012.
I don't think Amy Winehouse was that much of an influential artist, nor do I think she belongs (except for her age of dead) on this list, but it makes me wonder anyhow. I'm now nearly that age too and I haven't done anything awesome or memorable till now. That makes me feel a little bit sag.
Thanks again for this opportunity, NC, and thanks for all you do in the world of teen literature. All the best. Dom
McLaren had one of the fastest cars in 2011, on its day the MP4-26 was faster than the Red Bull. So the basic approach of the new car did not need to veer too far from direction McLaren had been following. Last year the season was blighted by poor form in pre season testing. Most of the winter tests were interrupted by exhaust problems, as the now near mythical “octopus” exhaust broke after a few laps out on track. This exhaust turned out to be far simpler than the rumours suggested. The exhausts ran sideways across the floor to exit in a longitudinal slit ahead of the rear wheels. This being a complex way to achieve the same sort of fluid skirt that Red Bull achieved with their outer blowing exhaust layout. Once McLaren had followed Red Bulls lead with the exhaust, they were able to catch up. McLaren perhaps even surpassed Red Bull with the exhaust blown diffuser, as the Mercedes Hot Blown engine mappings were superior to the Renault cold blown solutions. Despite the rules trying cap the hot blown benefits as early the Canadian GP, the Silverstone GP weekend showed how much McLaren were lost relative to Red Bull when the restrictions really bit hard.
Now for the 15 Bloggers to whom I pass the Award...this part was really hard as I love a lot of blogs! But since you know I'm smitten with all the blogs featured in my Best of the Best Series, I thought I'd show you some additional ones I adore just as much:
I started this draft about a month ago or so and yes I know I have not been very proud of myself in keeping this blog updated as often as I wanted to. I had to keep changing the content as the week passed by because so many things are happening. In fact, I was writing part of this post on my "vacation" somewhere in Prairieville, Louisiana where thunderstorm and wind warning are so common. Yup, that's right! I went away from the beautiful California to Houston for a few days to visit my sister, then off to Louisiana, for a good reason. In a way, San Jose reminds me about the long hours at work and thinking about that is exhausting sometimes. So, it feels really good to be away from that at least.
Mamma Mia
Earth Vs. The Spider (B&W) 1958 aka The Spider. A giant spider living in a cave on the edge of town attacks a girl's father on his way home to her birthday. Searching for him, the girl and her boyfriend discover the spider, and her father's withered corpse. They come back with the cops and spray the monster with DDT. Thinking it's dead, they haul it to the school auditorium, where a rock & roll band's practice session wakes it up and sends it on a rampage through the town. Surprisingly, they show a blood-covered toddler wandering around the rubble! When the spider returns to the cave the townspeople want to blow it up, but a couple of the teens are lost in there. Classic Bert I. Gordon giant-bug horror is more engaging than most and sports good special effects (although the size of the spider does seem to fluctuate from shot to shot; sometimes it's big as a house, other times it seems about the size of a car).
Well, the straight haired girls
Welcome to my first ever blog--- Charmed In Third Grade! After a few short weeks of stalking blogs and becoming a blog addict, I've decided to venture out and create a blog about my passion, teaching 3rd grade! I hope to network, continue to learn about the art of teaching, and of course collaborate and share ideas with other teachers!
As The Students In California Are Protesting Against The Cuts In The Education Budgets, Who Will Be The Next Governor On Location To Reduce Unemployement And Develop The Freedom Of The Press With Mike Fuller?
The Emerald package is really only suitable for those authors wishing to simply have a proper printed copy of their finished book and does not include ISBN/EAN and online/trade distribution. The book will simply be available from the publisher own bookstore. The author will receive 1 paperback copy and a very basic interior and cover design.
Cosby advised his listeners to talk not only to their children but also to cousins, nieces, nephews and neighbors. “Get into people’s business,” he said. “You’re a taxpayer and you’re tired of picking up the tab for someone’s sexual moments.”
4. Cody Rhodes v. Big Show for the IC title in a table match
14.Fiddling John Carson / Bachelor's Hall
Could you tell us a little about the history of the conference?
6) Given a little time, my kids are perfectly able to find things in a picture without needing a huge flashing arrow to help them.
One place might be historical context. The majority of the statements pointed to in recent articles were from the late 80′s and early 90′s, most of 20 years ago. George Bush the 1st famously won the 1988 election with the “Willie Horton” ad. It essentially accuses the Democratic candidate of being in league with black rapists. The Republicans won by using language that was only slightly more veiled than that used in Paul’s newsletters. Paul was far out on the fringes back then, where more extreme rhetoric was seen as acceptable. This explanation adds to understanding, but does not excuse.
As it turned out, my mother didn't really like children. They were messy, time consuming, and demanding of her attention and affection. She liked the idea of children as it fit into whatever role she was currently playing, but she didn't actually like to spend time with her children. Oh, I'm sure she loved us in her way but she just didn't have much interest in us til we became teenagers, something she would
The application involved software for tracking development. of software products. A representative claim on appeal read:
Encryption and peer-to-peer networking have become widely used on the Internet for everyday communications, advocates say. Online purchases, financial transactions and even e-mail messages are routinely encrypted these days. And some new laws setting privacy standards have encouraged the wide use of encryption for storing and transmitting health information and other electronic or online records.
Intersexuality
If you do – be business minded and network.
I never made it to target five, since moments later, as I waited for my panini, someone came out of nowhere and squirted me with their shark. I was obligated to turn over all the sharks I’d collected and tell her who her new target was (the person I was supposed to be getting).
– Egg Man, Paul’s Boutique
Meanwhile whisk the eggs with the cream (or milk) and add salt and pepper, pour this over the chard.
Sometime in the very early hours of September 29, 2007, a 911 call was received from a cell phone stating that a man was lying unconscious in a pool of blood on a sidewalk in the Albany Houses. When police and EMS arrived, they found Steven Ingram unresponsive but alive, his clothes stained with blood and his face swollen and disfigured from what appeared to have been an assault. Mr. Ingram was taken to Kings County Hospital, where he lay in a coma for over two months before succumbing to his injuries on December 18, 2007. The cause of death was determined to be blunt force trauma to the head, and the case, hitherto an unsolved assault, became a homicide. The sidewalk where Mr. Ingram was found is pictured above.
UNCG’s best player is Trevis Simpson, a 6’4″ guard. Like Elon’s Troutman, he was on last year’s league all-frosh team. Simpson is a volume shooter who blows hot and cold, but when he’s hot he can get very hot (at Miami, he hit 7 of 11 three-pointers as part of a 36-point explosion). The Citadel must work hard, especially early in the game, to make sure he doesn’t get on a roll.
Wanted to go for a run after breakfast and when I asked Isabelle if it was safe, and by asked her yes I did it in Spanish! Who’s impressed? :) She told me it was safe and if I just went down a couple blocks there was a grande parque, now my Spanish isn’t the best yet but I think I knew what this meant without having to look it up! As I went running pumped to find the place where I could potentially chillax and play soccer and read outside this is what I found:
5. Speaking of ass, CELLULITE.
Here is my poor attempt at a design board for myself (and P) so we can see how everything really looks together. This is why I need a new computer and Photoshop (this was made in Word, forgive me)!
salaamz
I know it's not a great offer but if someone will be eager to have it I'll gladly send it away. Just let me know. It's in English of course:)
I dance and perform. Something I would have never had the courage to do if it weren't for the people in this city who drew it out of me.
4. A garden wagon, one that hold LOTS of plants for ining and outing
Secondly, we have the "Download PR Material" section. Here you can download some promotional posters.
I digress...again.
And now for something completely different.
I snorted.
You're so full of principles and need to budge a little when making those moral stands. You're really not better than anybody else and really need to get a firm hold on that rampant ego of yours before it hurts you or somebody else!
Since I have two daughters, girly things are a must in our house and I am always on the lookout for any new ideas and treasures. On one of my outings I found two little cotton dresses in a thrift store and I knew right away what I was going to do with them. My thoughts were directed toward a little girl's or baby's room decor.
My second desk - usually used to stash stuff I'm working on and used for pinning/trimming. Lots of drawers underneath full of more stuff. Not sure what (apart from the top two which I use all the time) and I'm too scared to clean them out. I don't use it for cutting as it's too low and not all that flat. Love my view of our garden though :)
But not so much, that did not give me fear
I know there are exceptions. Grandparents, or strangers who open their hearts and their homes and give all the love they possibly can. But we have abortion and there are still thousands of children growing up in this country without love, hugs, an environment where they can trust and be innocent. Legislating more of this is the mark of a society that is governing without compassion by people acting in their own narrow self-interest.
… or, if you’re moving to a dorm like Tori, you can add some wire to the back of the frame & hang the frame on a couple wall-friendly, removable 3M hooks. To really maximize wall space, add a few tiny hooks along the bottom of the frame so that you can hang your necklaces, too!
scrub the toilets,
The former X Factor judge said heels were the important part of her outfit: “Because I’m quite small, to me getting dressed is all about the heels.
I would rate myself as average or below when it comes to the amount of television that I watch. There are a few shows that I enjoy and make a point of catching, one of them being ABC's Castle. Donna at What's Past is Prologue did a very interesting comparison between the show Castle and genealogy research.
During Shivaji’s reign, as per estimates, more than 300 ships of 300 tons capacity were launched. The Wadias alone built more than 350 ships – during 1735-1863 170 war vessels for the East India Company, 34 man-of-war defence vessels for the British Navy, 87 merchant vessels for private firms, and three vessels for the Queen of Muscat at Bombay docks.
If this is how a man treats his spouse and she's alone
You can use any kind of winter squash (mine was one of those ufo squashes, but butternut would be great, sugar pumpkin, delicata,
Have you guys seen the new images?
Method #2- Freeze mixture until solid. Take a fork and scrape it over the frozen mixture in a raking-like motion until icy flakes form.
Do you think I eat the flesh of bulls, *
And a few more:
(Full disclosure; I partially insisted on taking the ride knowingly full well they make me absolutely nervous.)
For the souring culture I decided to again go about reusing some of a yeast cake from the Bugfarm lambic I brewed up about 2yrs ago. That beer is nicely sour, very minimally funky with subtle fruity undertones. Something I think will work well in this beer. Hopefully the souring happens quickly, because I'd like to be drinking this in about 2-3mos.
SUMMIT AVENUE is an absorbing book, the sort you can’t bear to put down and keep picking up again almost in spite of yourself. The best thing I find, in those circumstances, if you can, is to submit, put life on hold for a while and enjoy... and I did, all the way through. The book is based in a period before, during and just after the first world war in Minneapolis. The time and place are very well evoked, not only in the descriptions but also in the minds of people that live there. It is very interesting to see the world through the eyes of a girl based in the US looking back at Europe, especially during a time when her home country, Germany, is at war with just about everyone else. She sees the reports and propaganda which demonise her own country and we learn about her reactions. In fact a lot of information about the era is incorporated in a skilful and entertaining way - not just about the first world war but also about the life of people struggling to find their way in early twentieth century America.
It adds to my guilt
Pretty much every business regulated by the city gave money — bars, restaurants, developers. Some of the big boys, like Concord Pacific, swung both ways. They gave $35,000 to Vision Vancouver and around $12,000 to the NPA. Bob Rennie gifted $35,000 in advertising to the NPA. Meanwhile, Rennie Marketing Systems handed $1,000 to Vision.
Equity Balance @ 02/29/2012: $3,872.57
Lets begin with whom this program attracts: mostly non-Russian, non-Russian speaking Westerners who have no attachment to the nation but will come for some corporation of other, work off one or two or three years and leave with their large pay.
Wolves are interesting creatures. They were so close to getting wiped out, but being ferocious predators, humans helped rejuvenate their population in parts of the planet. Their pack structure is also very cool to me, with the alpha male and everything. I think the kid in me would run as far as possible from that role, but the adult side of me can’t wait to step up and be that figure, but at what price?
Maybe if he was a utilitarian God, He would need us all to work hard for Him. Or if He were a strong lord who demanded our obedience, maybe then all He would really want from us was to be committed soldiers who fight for His cause. But what about the God who made the rose? Who made the simplicity of child’s smile, the wonder of sexual intimacy, the brilliance of the night sky? What would He want for this universe? For you and I?
One of my favorite pieces is this gorgeous old wooden chair that’s been painted bright turquoise – unique and beautiful!
FATHER’S DAY is one of those.
Reading this book has made me curious about Scottish history. I was thinking about looking online to see if this war is a true story and what the outcome was, but I didn't want to ruin the ending for myself. But trust me, I will be checking into the history when I'm done reading.
Let me draw an (imperfect — I’ll come to that) analogy. Suppose you go to your usual supermarket and find that their prices have suddenly become extraordinarily high. Of course, you walk out, but suppose you are intercepted by an employee of the supermarket and asked whether you are aware of their new “hamper deals” — you get a hamper that contains a wide variety of food items, and it works out far cheaper than buying all those items individually. You have a look in the hamper and you find that it does indeed contain pretty much everything on your normal shopping list, but it also contains a number of things you didn’t plan to buy, some of which you would be quite pleased to have and others of which you would probably end up throwing away. You note to yourself that the hamper is somewhat more expensive than what you have been used to spending at this supermarket, even if it is indeed much cheaper than buying the items individually. But you do get those extra items, so you decide, slightly reluctantly, to go for the hamper deal.
Roger's books such as What Am I Still Doing Here?, Seasonal Suicide Notes and The Life and Death of Peter Sellers, may be perused and bought here.
My Couch to 5K program is nearly finished. I’m running 2.5 miles three times this week. In fact, today will be my last run as such. Next week, I will increase it to 2.75. I’ve introduced heated yoga to my weekly routine and I’ve even signed up for a 2 and a half hour heated yoga workshop at Newport Power Yoga at the end of the month. I renewed my forty day commitment to eating vegan after Easter. I’ve been doing well, but I’ve been struggling with temptations to slack off more frequently than I did during my first forty day stint.
Deuteronomy 22:22 If a man is found sleeping with another man’s wife, both the man who slept with her and the woman must die. You must purge the evil from Israel.
When and Where: The event will be held at the Silver Stage High School, 3755 West Spruce Street, Silver Springs, Nevada, on Friday, April 13, from noon to 5pm and Saturday, April 14, from 9am to 5pm.
What to do when the pool company tells you there was NO Possible
DP's from MME, cardstock, stamps, ink, buttons and twine from PTI, paper doily from Martha Stewart, misc. seam binding ribbon, paper flowers and pearl adhesives.
One key proposal, which would reverse centuries of press freedom, was for the state to oversee a new media regulator replacing the Press Complaints Commission.
I am not -- I had to give up something in order to keep up, and that was it. :)
The format for a press release is somewhat different from that of an article although many of the rules for writing good articles do apply. Webwire offers some universal guidelines as well as a sample release. The following tips will get you started, but be sure to adhere to all of the specifications before submitting a release.
You are told that each one is either red or green on one side, and that each one has either a circle or a square on the other side.
On the egghead side of things, I’m proud to say I’m finally (finally!) just over two hundred pages away from finishing Proust. It’s been a six-month project; and though it’s been tough going at times, I’ve been under its spell for quite a while now, and happily so. True: Not much happens, but it doesn’t happen so beautifully, in prose that is truly spellbinding (the Scott Moncrieff translation for me, merci bien) and this seven-novel novel is reflective of a worldview that is so utterly complete it seems to me every novelist’s duty to give it a go at some point. But yes, it’s a commitment. No argument there. My advice: Commit!
January 31st – was 37.1 lbs lighter
Israel Arrests 14-year-old Girl Among 600-700 Arrested So Far in the West Bank Village of Awarta! The IMF and World Bank Creating Crises Throughout The World ! Bob Tuskin Interviews Jay Parker: Satanic Ritualistic Sexual Abuse, CIA Monarch Trauma Based Mind Control, Luciferian New World Order … Rival Ambitions: US & China on Collision Course Over Libya? Heldman: US in Ungovernable Situation! Rising Corporatism-Fascism! S&P Affirms US AAA Rating, Cuts Outlook to Negative! Lou Dobbs Puts Geithner on the Hot Seat for Financial Terrorism! Samuel Jaberg And Myret Zaki: Dollar Faces Collapse!
This Candy will end 8pm on the 4th June.
After another three to five sets of some boring Jack Lalanne-isms we'd be released to do our own thing. Ummm... fun?? Not usually. The boys would wander off to one side of the gym and pick teams for dodge ball - fatties on one side, jocks on the other. It was a massacre! Never underestimate the strength of a fat kid with a chance to ping a ball off of some snotty jock's groin! Nuff said about that...
Pretty much identical to “I don´t know” which is it´s literal meaning. Argentines use it all the time as a filler, similar to how we do in English. Es un helado, que sé yo, cremoso y dulce. It´s a type of ice cream that´s, I don´t know, creamy and sweet. Salís esta noche? No, quiero quedarme en casa para, que sé yo, limpiar, ver tele.
Until the introduction of Indigofera, this was the most important blue dye in Asia.
“I’ve gotten some really lovely emails, like, ‘You suck, and you’ll be the next one to burn,’” says Wallace. Here are a few choice selections from the artist’s inbox:
This photo does not show the colors correctly for some reason but, the left one is a teal color, the middle is black and the right is blue. There is also a red, orange, yellow and green one not pictured here.
"Put it this way Shag, when Black Pudding gets here he'll add a bit of pace to you".
On that note, Obama cares more about his own image than he cares about the image of America or it's people... let me explain. Obama recently visited Venezuela where he met with their EXTREMELY anti-American President Hugo Chavez. Chavez published a book titled "Open veins of Latin America, five centuries of pillage of a continent" which "explains" and I mean that in the lightest of terms, how America is EVIL and has destroyed this hemisphere.Why on earth would you accept an anti-American literature? YOU'RE THE PRESIDENT! If it was me I would have told him... thanks, but no thanks(palin)! HA HA! Also After meeting with Chavez, Obama met with other Latin America leaders where he said, "I'm grateful that President Ortega did not blame me for things that happened when I was 3 months old."Obama... let me write this is capital letters so you will understand me... 1. YOU ARE NOT ON THE CAMPAIGN TRAIL ANYMORE! 2. I find it despicable that you found it more prudent to "defend" yourself than your country right after President Ortega bashed the U.S. for a whole hour. Obama is a ME-MONSTER... ME ME ME ME ME... -You can say what you want about the American people, just don't hurt my feelings : )
Importantly, Manchester’s is not a deal with the City Council, but with the Greater Manchester Combined Authority (GMCA) – the strategic authority for all ten Manchester boroughs, whose statutory city region status is clearly accepted by Ministers as having at least the strength and accountability of a city mayor.
In a previous posting, The KGB was not a Rock Band, dated January 5, 2011, I mentioned that I would consider posting a follow-up article concerning “intelligence agencies”, and the role they are playing in furthering the agenda of their decadent masters.
B: I have a job for you.
My earliest convenience got me there yesterday afternoon. McGill's is a pretty small place, maybe 12 tables, but at least 3 waiters walking around. I must say the service was spectactular and Marty, my waiter, was very speedy and friendly. He walked right up after I was seated and mentioned the specials. I didn't pay attention because I was just going to get some French onion soup. I told him that and Marty gave me a wink and a smile and said "you must have heard how great it is". I said I did.
The Pakistan Electronic Media Regulatory Authority (PEMRA) is really stepping up its efforts to, at least superficially, hold the media accountable. First they made their public complaints archive publicly accessible online – good job, although a glance at the complaints does highlight the issue of their complaint centre being hijacked by propaganda-laden trolling.
Originally my plan for the ties was to sew some ribbon on. But after the great time-saving cheat of the Heatn' Bond tape, I figured I'd press my luck and see if I couldn't make it work with what I had on hand. I used scrap fabric and a few lengths of tape to create 4 ties.
SUPER BODY, SUPER BRAIN incorporates an active use of motor skills. The importance of exercising balance and coordination may help improve children’s brain functioning in the following areas: attention, memory, multitasking, spatial memory and decision-making. For example raising heels and arms at the same time will improve kids’ attention and multitasking skills. This could correlate to listening to the teacher and writing in a piece of paper)
Green beans are steamed with a drizzle of Olive Oil and dash of salt.
He of the mighty limb.
There are right ways of doing things and there are wrong ways of doing things. I am here to explain to you the right way of doing something important; namely eating a cupcake.
I normally make my version of the Korean bean sprout and cabbage side dishes when I make kal-bi. I love the sprouts, but along with them, I wanted something else. Eggplant. I came up with this and even Chaz was happy with it. I think “really like” was his word choice.
What a mysterious witch the lady is
Turns out he hacks out great in therapy lessons...with an instructor and sidewalkers. My definition of hacking out is a bit different. So I cleaned up, hopped back on in the indoor, and made that little son-of-a-gun MARCH! ...in spite of the stars before my eyes.
One day I will blog about the builders and how much of my tea they are drinking, the mess they are making going upstairs to the toilet, the amount of cigarette butts on my lawn, the noise, the upheaval, the extra debt.
If having committed sin through folly, one does meritorious acts understanding their nature, one succeeds, by such righteousness, in cleansing one’s self from sin even as a piece of dirty cloth is washed clean by means of some saline substance.
no way to calm him down,
Pixmania is a pan-European e-commerce retailer. It is present in 26 countries and boasts 7 million clients in Europe. Besides the possibility to shop online the clients can shop and pick up their products directly from Pixmania showrooms (Paris, Boulogne-Billancourt, Lille, Lyon, Marseille, Nice, Toulouse, Rennes, Brussels, Milan, Torino, Rome, Madrid, Barcelona, Lisbon and Porto).
Look up Little Princess - celebrating the life of Queen Victoria. The newspaper that provided the majority of the decoration was from the week that Queen Victoria died, so its very authentic. This mannequin comes with a magnifying glass so you can look at everything in detail. It also has a heart shaped box on the base where you can store tiny precious things.
Chlorella is a wonderful whole food supplement to take during fasts and cleanses, as it is incredibly detoxifying. Chlorella acts as a solid support because it is so nutrient-dense without saddling the body with a lot of material to metabolize. Add it to your routine during your next juice feast!
I almost reach it
Here is the itemized list:
“He’ll be working,” I said primly. If wishes were horses ... God knows there was plenty to do.
Mar.15th - Well known anniversary gifts are SILVER and GOLD... celebrating those big milestone years! We challenge you to make a card or project that uses either SILVER OR GOLD! How easy is that!!! Project must be linked to Mr Linky on the Mar. 15 Challenge Post on the ODBD Blog by 8:00 pm EST. Winner will be announced on the 16th challenge post!
Here are all our hop stops, make sure you stop at every stop, find the ABC Hop posting and leave a comment to be entered in to our prize draw.
Well. So we thought at the time.
The usual carrion-feeders, scavengers and looters soon swarmed to the battlefield, to profit from all that death and destruction. Word spread, attracting others, together with worshippers who came on a pilgrimage to the graveyard of the gods. These faithful quickly laid claim to the land, fought off the looters, and reclaimed the bones and rotting carcasses of their fallen gods. Over time a settlement formed, which was soon absorbed by the expanding kingdom.
beneficial ownership of Uniphoenix Corporation shares.
He has dirty blonde hair that changes shade with the seasons, just like mine. He has light brown eyes and a few freckles that only appear in the sun. His skin is fair but not pale, and he enjoys reading and Sudoku. He’s at least a little unstable, like me, but who isn’t? He was in band in middle school because his grandfather played the saxophone, and continued in high school because he’d fallen in love with making music.
The audience in this paper is anyone who thinks that baseball is all about hanging out in the dugout messing around with your teammates and being lazy. I want to show these people that the players take the game very seriously and that there is a lot of testosterone on the field.
And when I say I was shot back in time? I mean, I forgot where I was, who was around, and for a short time, I was newly 13, smelling that wonderful California air, feeling the coolness of that tacky old linoleum floor against my legs, and reliving the happy anxious feelings that only a new teenage girl can understand when thinking about boys and the future.
Nigel Poustie makes Sunbeam Ales.
According to the Brooklyn Eagle, this would be a partnership between NYU and several other universities worldwide — City University of New York, Carnegie Mellon University, University of Toronto, University of Warwick and Indian Institute of Technology Bombay – as well as IBM and Cisco.
The cuts were lower -- 2.7 percent this year and 4 percent next year -- for the Department of Education and the four uniformed agencies, the NYPD, FDNY, Sanitation and Correction.
"I have a responsibility to do what I can to foster stability, understanding, and healing in
I know every bird in the sky, *
At the National Energy Regulator of SA (Nersa) hearings in Durban last month, Cosatu's Zet Luzipo and the SA Institute of Electrical Engineers warned that Eskom's proposed tariff hike would lead to more illegal connections because electricity users could not afford the cost of power.
I hope you'll like her songs too.
Everything seems to running in the fast forward mode ever since I stepped into Motherhood! It's awesome on one hand but terrible on the other hand because it just make me feel guilty that I've not done many things that I targeted to have them done so in 2011!!!!
Here’s my advice: if you made it through the past two months of holiday “festivities,” maybe crying in your eggnog while hurled in a fetal position in your bed (oh wait, that was me..) then this too, shall pass.
At some point, I believe we will all be expected to be fluent in social media. From my perspective, this means that we will basically be unable to stay truly connected without it. This naturally leads one to question—if social media is beneficial to those involved with it, or if it will create more of a divide amongst individuals who don’t have access to the Internet on a daily basis.
Wedlock – and specifically the husband – often appears in the works of Sufi women poets as an impediment to the quest for truth, and is perceived not as a temptation but as an obstruction. It is not the husband’s beauty or other allurements that must be resisted, but his interference, even tyranny. Both Lalla Arifa, also known as Lal Ded, and Mirabai walked out on their marriages. Lalla, who was a saint and mystic from Kashmir who lived in the 14th century, was married at the age of twelve to a Brahman and was badly treated by her mother-in-law. Her mother-in-law used to place a stone in her plate covered with a thin layer of food, starving the young Lalla. On the festive occasion of grihashanti (literally ‘peace at home’), Lalla’s friends teased her about the excellent food she would get to eat, to which she replied with the now famous verse: ‘They may kill a big sheep or a tender lamb, Lalla will have her lump of stone all right.’
(black crab).
Accepted
Who is a sex doll.
FACTOID: The production company is Indian Paintbrush, which is another name for the butterfly weed.
It should not require much comment, but there are certainly better and worse performances (of interpretations) as there are tremendous and dubious performances on the stage. What I suppose is interesting about this consideration is that we are tempted to think of the author as the puppet-master of the text…but there is far more at play. Rather the reader is the director interpreting the screen-play (hopefully without gross distortions of the screen-play, but the screen-play may be gross in its own right and the performance could be better than the author’s intention). I should again mention (as Adler & van Doren did) that not every screenplay is worth a good performance – but some certainly are. Further, those directors who choose to interpret challenging works are more likely to better perform another work – while interpretation of such sort is unlikely to ever be the ‘perfect’ performance, this need not be the cause of any despair.
Okay, so this is kind of a silly recipe (actually two recipes), but it is surprisingly tasty, and has a story to go with it.
I’m sorry about most of those things.
Siletz Brewing
so it’s no secret that I think Titanic is just about the worst. I’ve stated it on numerous occasions. I’m not trying to hide the fact.
I nodded again.
What sad empty lives some people lead!
The outside of the house looks impressive. Construction on the house began in August of 1873 and the family settled there in September of 1874. The architect was Edward Tuckerman Potter and the structure is an example of Victorian Gothic Revival architecture. The brickwork, the eaves and the gables makes the exterior look quite busy and at times it feels overwhelming to take in all the detail.
mostly public union debt for retirement packages and contractual medical coverage may total six billion dollars.
“There are lots of reasons why people can have premature babies but it’s most likely that’s from listeria,” he said.
After that busy night, we recovered today by hanging out around the park, taking in the pool this afternoon and visits to neighbours. We made an early reservation for 5 pm to Las Casuelas Terrazo in Palm Springs, and it seemed like everyone else in Palm Springs had the same idea. Busy!! Then we took in the Street Fest, enjoying the booths, the people watching and the wonderful Boys and Girls Club Jazz Band. Great night, except that I forgot my camera - darn!
"Abracadabra" by Steve Miller Band
-Break out the games. If you and your significant other enjoy board games, gather a few of your favorite games and have your own mini-tournament at the dining room table. My husband and I like to quiz each other using the Trivial Pursuit cards without playing the entire game. Make up your own rules. You can – you are a grown-up!
reality television - more of it is always bad
The first book in the Maximum Ride franchise. This series has always been strong and continues to entice new readers. The eighth book, Nevermore, is due out in August. The boys also like the Graphic Novel adaptation of this series.
Joy is contagious but the world, by its very nature, is pessimistic. Today we are looking at Acts 27:25. The apostle Paul is addressing those on board the stricken vessel in the middle of theMediterranean Sea. They are in great trouble and here is what he says.
Kraftwerk The model D
since today's upset had deep roots in frustration he then started talking about hitting the pillows (which we've green-lighted as an acceptable target for hitting hands in our house) and "shaking it out", which we do with our arms to let our frustrated feelings out. so after he cried he hit the pillows a bit which led to some silly time rolling around on the bed, laughing.
While at CHA I went to something called "Be Inspired- A Canadian Designer Look & Learn Special Event for Retailers" Eight designers were given a box of supplies from 4 different sponsors. (Canvas Corp, DecoArt, Loisirs Harmonie and Tsukineko ) With the supplies, each designer had to come up with something and tell us all about it. Each participant was given the same box of supplies and although we had instructions for each designer project I decided to do my own thing!
During the week, the TD Sean Fleming referred to senators’ allowances as “the best kept secret in a long number of years”. For a country with an ample presence of political journalists, you might ask why this is so. Indeed you might ask why there isn’t reporting of TDs’ other income, pension benefits, expenses, hiring of relatives and other allowances. Or is it because our journalists have for the most part changed careers and become stenographers?
Well you certainly kept myself and Gina busy with all your entries to our DT call. We couldn’t believe how many applications we received, but it was really nice to know so many of you wanted to join our team. It was such a difficult decision and we could have chosen at least 20 new members!! However we were strict and kept to our original mission to choose just 4 new members. We’re sorry if you’re name isn’t below as one of our new members but please don’t lose hope, when we’re looking again in the future we hope you will try again.
Of many tears and pain
white and even like your teeth?
Category: Calendars
1 tbsp. ice water
But you don't "break out of stereotypes" by reinforcing them.
Legislation...without elected ministers
A sign, I thought, that I was at least on the right lines – for it must mean I have a lot to say.
I ended up running out of time and still have to tackle my closet. I feel like I haven't bought clothes since I've been a mother, but I guess all of my clothing purchases while in college has been enough to keep me going. I swear my walk-in-closet is full, and yet I've still got five boxes of clothes, three boxes of shoes, one box of purses, and one box of hats, stacked into a three neat little piles that I plan on tackling next weekend.
If you answered A,B, or D, you are welcome to pack your things and move out, you don't belong in Townsville. Our winner asked a lady she met in a bar to watch her house. She couldn't even provide the woman's last name or address.
…but apparently, and according to WordPress, if you do find yourself at the end of the internet you can find a link to bring you here: where hopefully you can find a few ideas that might help you figure out where to try next…
9. Serve with warm chapthi or rice.Enjoy....
Allagash White
On Tuesday, October 25, (today) join Hopworks Urban Brewery and the artists from Jolby to celebrate the release of Pig War NW Style Ale. At both Hopworks Urban Brewery and Hopworks BikeBar brewers will raise a toast to our estate ale and the San Juan Island farm that exclusively grew the hops for this beer.
So anyway, why am I talking about this? Basically because this whole thing then really fucks up my motivation and will to exercise and eat well. I was so tired today that after taking Ned to daycare I slept on and off all day. That is until about 4pm when my hips started twitching again. I know some say that exercise helps but I find this is the opposite to me. When I have walked a lot through the day or have done a work out my hips suffer terribly later in the night. Add DOMS (delayed onset muscle soreness) to that and I'm tremendously uncomfortable.
Meanwhile I ran from the bathroom and, of course, immediately googled 'MY BABY ATE POOP' and instead of sordid tales of e-coli, I found it to be a fairly common and typically harmless occurrence. (Seriously, how did people mother before google?)
Teazers owner Lolly Jackson was shot and killed in Kempton Park, east of Johannesburg, on Monday, Ekurhuleni police said.
If your mum’s not available, why not do some research amongst your customers and stakeholders, even end user consumers? As I said earlier, in my experience, the man on the Clapham omnibus has an unerring ability to spot cant, inconsistency and blandness. What is more, just as ordinary consumers are becoming increasingly au fait with marketing concepts and terminology, they are also becoming very familiar with corporate mission statements. A large part of the population now works in organisations that trumpet their mission statements, whether they’re employed in the private or the public sector. So they know all about corporate gibberish and how it feels to be encumbered by a nonsense mission statement. When I have worked with consumers on developing mission statements I have found them invaluable in helping clarify the thinking, identifying what’s really important and finding distinctive ways of expressing it.
For those who refuse to enter the New Paradise I will do everything in My Power to stop you from turning your back on the inheritance which is rightfully yours.
Final words go to Peter Prowse:
At the January 26 cabinet meeting, Carlo Scissura, special advisor to Brooklyn Borough President Marty Markowitz, asked if the number of workers would increase as the opening date of the arena approaches in September.
Here's what you'll need to make your own:
If you spend enough time on the streets of New York City and mingle, you are going to experience a depth and breadth of humanity that boggles the mind. Not only will you find an absolutely astonishing number of people with incredible talent, but likely, you will on occasion find the serendipitous meetings to be even more amazing.
a very special day swapping pressies and cards
** I started my first challenge blog last month, please stop by Scrappin' Chics Challenge Blog to see what the designers have created. Come join the fun and enter our challenge. The sponsor for June is Scraps to Treasures.
Spoon the mixture into the prepared tin and level the top gently.
The macroscopic view of the unmanifest super-numeral hymn
Holly: "See that Geode? It came from Mimi's place in Arkansas."
A hearty and healthy weeknight dinner is now served.
“But to some of the Jews the destruction of Herod’s army seemed to be divine vengeance, and certainly a just vengeance, for his treatment of John, surnamed the Baptist. For Herod had put him to death, though he was a good man and had exhorted the Jews to lead righteous lives, to practice justice towards their fellows and piety
In one scene between Tom Wilkinson’s character, Doctor Fowley, and a Prosecuting Attorney, we are given very deliberate close-ups of what the doctor is looking at. He doesn’t seem to be listening to what the lawyer says. Instead he is distracted by the lawyer’s nonchalant mannerisms, such as the way he plays with his car keys.
10. Death By Fire
I'm sorry to contradict my Master, but that's not wholly true.
The lessons of (film) history
Engineered by Chicago-punk veteran Iain Burgess (the man behind Big Black's "Atomizer"), "Everyday-Everyman" has a memorably corrosive sound: the guitars emit a rasping, wrecked jingle-jangle, the drums are dry and convulsive, and the bass is as metallic as rust, as thundering as a roar. Two opposites define the album: a psychotic obsession for hyper-cerebral intrication and aseptic structures, and a feeling of total clumsiness and lack of precision.
Full of shame, full of fear, full of sadness, of pain, of great sorrow. I was completely lost, and for the first time in a long time, I sang during worship and I meant it.
The pattern calls it a vest, but it's more like a short-sleeve cardigan, which is just what I wanted. Were I to make this again, I'd decrease for the neckline sooner, and make it more of a deep-v.
Take care everyone.
I’m not perfect. I’m quite often considered rude. But I won’t be mean.
Make your hero somewhat on the short side. It gives him something to overcome and still come out the hero. While this won’t work for all fiction, it may work for some. If he has to be tall and muscular, what about making him blonde with brpwm eyes? Or even a (gasp) redhead? In all my reading, I’ve never seen a redheaded hero. Granted, men with red hair are unusual – but it could work. Why not try something different?
That much of a traitor I wasn’t.
20:00 (8:00 p.m.) – Greenwich Time – London, England
I've made a card using the Gerber Daisies stamp set by Flourishes and coloured it with Copics - RV10, RV21, RV13, E50, E53, E11, E33, YG11, YG63, YG67. I hope you are inspired to play along and we can't wait to see what you make!!
was among them.
Strong performances from the leads, as well as from two great stage performers, Ray Bolger and Fanny Brice, who appear as themselves, made this movie a joy. The likeable William Powell (The Thin Man) stars as Ziegfeld, and because Powell never appears in a movie without Myrna Loy, she plays his sensible second wife, Billie Burke (who, Wikipedia tells me, played Glinda the Good Witch in The Wizard of Oz). Luise Rainer won an Oscar for her performance as Ziegfeld’s first wife, Anna Held. A fickle, jealous French actress, Anna continues to love Ziegfeld even after she divorces him. Despite the good acting from Loy, Powell, and Rainer, I was totally taken with Fanny Brice and Ray Bolger.
Unearthly is a moving tale of love and fate, and the struggle between following the rules and following your heart.
Progesterone SKYROCKETED! From 14.9 to 40.1 phew! I was worried about that but it seems that the supplements are doing the trick. I’m still supposed to stick to the 2x per day for now.
I definitely have no trust in the law, police or judges. There wasn’t one judge that said to Basildon council, ‘After all this length of time, did you help any family?’ Tony Ball said there were too many Travellers in Essex. If he said that about any other culture, he would be thrown out of government but if you say it about Travellers you can get away with it.
Check back here daily to see the Random High Five of the BlackTopLive rally, and I’ll be putting up the best submissions from you guys too.
I will just warmly recommend it to you. You won’t regret it.
And thus, some youthful dreams ne’er pass the swale
Left-wing BNP
your family. Then there will be hard hands
One of the highlights of the obligatory pep talk occurs when the agency manager solemnly states that old slice of baloney that "we're all creative."
RNixon Resigning.
In 1979 Jimi records an album with famed producer Quincy Jones entitled Nightvisions. This marks Jimi’s first foray into electronic-based dance music. Jones is coming off the highly successful Off The Wall release and Hendrix’s career had been weaning. Jones influences Hendrix to use drum machines and synthesizers. Hendrix–always wanting his music to appeal more to a black audience–was more than willing to follow Jone’s lead in the studio. The album has guest appearances by Chaka Kahn, Kathy Sledge, and Sly Stone. It was a crossover hit and opened Jimi up to an entirely new audience while alienating some of his long time fans. The album reaches #9 on the charts.
The two-minute footage shows eight of the gorillas making their way through a forest in Cameroon. The video offers a glimpse of classic gorilla behavior, yet also reveals the plight of the threatened apes.
Click on my Pinterest and look under Crafty to find the directions and orginial pin.
The plot is a structure around which Gough can do what he does best: knock seven bells out of certain aspects of contemporary society in a charming and hyperreal yarn of bonkers comic brilliance. (Even the copyright page is amusing without being annoying.) The storyline is a sequence of set pieces, where the characters are the satire and the satire is the action: the elements are inseparable and indistinguishable, and the scenes are constantly funny and constantly serious. Followers of Gough’s blog will know that he predicted the credit crunch with uncanny accuracy 18 months before the collapse of Lehman Brothers, and so it’s no surprise that large chunks of Jude in London deal with financial folly. (“The Celtic Tiger died long ago. In agony, after getting its goolies caught in the credit crunch.”) Two superb scenes show Gough at his best on this territory. First, former property speculators down on their luck try to build a wall using one brick and their old principles (“Brendan’s word is his bond. … Sorry, I should have said, as good as money in the bank. …Ah, yes, I meant, safe as Houses”). Second, there is a beautifully absurd analogy for the property crash rewritten as the Great Hargeisa Goat Bubble (first published on its own in 2003, and which you can read here). In these pieces, Gough pursues flights of fancy with ruthless logic. The perfect symbiosis he achieves between language and subject means that the comedy is a vehicle for the ideas at the same time that the ideas are a vehicle for the comedy.
Fables have long been used to tell stories and impart “moral” lessons. Not limited to bedtime stories, fables are a common device to propagate “lessons” that powerful interests wish to suffuse through a society. A favorite fable nowadays is that of the virtuous Germans and the lazy Greeks. Punishment – excuse me, “structural adjustment” — is the natural denouement of this oft-told fable.
Your tired, your poor, your huddled masses.
30 Minute Trail Run/Walk/Hike followed by:
How do you shop pre-owned?
Me and my friend did the Bridge of Nowhere hike in Azusa, CA yesterday. It was a 10 mile hike filled with river crossings, rock climbing and sandy dirt roads. We started at around 12 and finished by 5. We only took a maybe 2 10 min breaks headed to the bridge and going back we breezed through cuz we were so damn exhausted already.
Andrew Scott (Sloan)
As I speak to friends
It is already well documented that institutionalized anti-smoking proponents could care less about jobs, and proactively seek to ensure that people are fired, or never hired at all for this specific lifestyle choice. (re; Scotts Co. and the Cleveland Clinic are two easy examples of such bigotry to be cited) The claim that “jobs aren’t that easy to find” may have some merit in highly specialized fields, and in light of the current economy/job market conditions, but not while the hospitality industry maintains a “voluntary turnover” rate of more than 50% from year to year nationwide. Hospitality and leisure industry jobs are in fact very easy to find, and in a weak economy such as now, “It’s the only job I could get”, or “this is the only place that was hiring” is an all too common refrain. Jobs for Nuclear physicists, Chemists, Behavioral Scientists and any medical related profession such as a nurse in the Cleveland clinic are much more difficult to find, especially and specifically if you smoke, regardless of your qualifications.
He, too, has resigned his part
Despite the overly obvious names for the Demon and Angel love interests, there's nothing average about the love story being weaved here. If you're not into that sort of thing then the politics of Hell and Heaven will keep you captivated. There's murder, torture, and all kinds of dark and seedy things to keep a reader glued to the pages. The cast of characters are very memorable and not only did I find myself caring about the good guys, the bad guys captured my affections in a twisted way. This is the perfect book for fans of the Angel genre or those who haven't been able to quite get into it yet. Be prepared to stay up all night with this one!
I used this recipe for the sugar cookie part, mainly because it makes a ton and I was going to use one cookie on the top and one on the bottom to make them. Coming up with mystery ingredients wasn’t too hard: I made most of them “good flavors,” as you can see: blueberries, chocolate, jelly beans, etc.
The topic of "black site" arose. Abu Zubaydah was interrogated first by the FBI, using traditional methods of questioning. Rodriguez felt a ticking time bomb, and proposed an alternative set of interrogation procedures. 9/11 as a failure of imagination. Rodriguez said the CIA did not have a failure of imagination in 2002. Rodriguez got everyone to put on "their big boy pants" and thus no plausible deniability. There was a DoJ memo on 1 August 2002. Rodriguez described waterboarding, giving a sensation of drowning. Nudity was employed. "Cramped confinement box with an insect." Water applied from a height of 12 to 24 inches in water boarding. Insult slap. Sleep deprivation. Rodriguez: this program was not about hurting anyone, rather instilling a feeling of hopelessness and despair.
I am now going to work on some digital layouts that I may post later this week.
You should have better marketing ideas. May I send you some, or all off the manuscript?
fingers, ears in 5
The red lentil soup used to be a huge hit. Bowls and bowls were consumed by toddler and baby, and I took to making big batches and freezing them in single portions. It was so popular that at one point Pía demmanded it every night.
from yourself
Look at this pile of figgy pudding: Back in 1984, a young man named Billy Caldwell snapped after seeing his parents murdered by a criminal in a Santa suit, not to mention years of physical and psychological abuse at the hands of the Mother Superior of an orphanage, and slaughtered several people before being killed himself. Three years later, his now-grown little brother Ricky (Eric Freeman) is in a mental hospital, carrying with him the terrifying memory of his brother's death and the burning image of the Mother Superior that helped bring about Billy's violent demise. But starting a new life means avenging his brother's death by any means necessary... and this will be one night that definitely will not be silent.
When the meat is tender, splash in the flanders red or oud bruin to taste. You're trying to give the stew a nice acidity and bite that cuts through the rich sauce.
Guinsoo: Sigh. You’re asking for it, buddy.
Came Thug One and Thug Two.
11 - Tex Ritter - Singing In The Saddle - 2:51
The Sons of Light, a religious sect, follow the team and learn about the discovery. Almost two thousand years ago, they dedicated their lives to protect the secret of the parchments. Chased, shot at, even kidnapped, the team is determined to continue their research. A final bloody attack forces Erin to make a choice. Should she continue to risk the lives of her team or give up the chance to expose a 2000-year old secret?
His occupational therapist told me Friday they ordered him a new desk...a wrap around model to help with his focus when he does seat work. Seat work? I didn't know he was doing seat work. Yeah..and we're getting him cardboard dividers so when we work with him one on one, he is less distracted. Hum. So, maybe we're underestimating this boy. He's learning his colors? Sitting in a desk? Minding us? It was an eye opening last few days in regards to Peter, that's for certain.
I saw him once, at 58th and 8th or so, standing on a corner looking a little dazed. I went up to him and got his autograph that day. I could not wipe the smile from my face. I was too star-struck to say anything other than “You are such an inspiration to me.” I felt like such a dope. I wanted to tell him how much I loved Buffy and Angel and how the musical turned my brain to cream corn. But I couldn’t find the words. All I could do was grin and grin and grin.
13-It Hurts Me Too
We not only have the issue here of inequality before the law (i.e. special treatment for Muslims), but also the issue of rights; does the right of Muslim women to wear their veil whilst driving really trump the right other road users, pedestrians and general infidels have to be safe, to be protected by the law?
so im going to focus now on orienting myself for focusing on standby *ick… : (* and just sell what i have completed currently.
Watch the short video. It says it all.
Emerald is considered a birthstone for the month of May.
wicked and tyrannical Assyria after using its wickedness to Judge Apostate
My grandfather unexpectedly died the week before my wedding. He and Jesse had developed a very close, unique relationship and he had been wanting us to tie the knot for several years. He was so excited about our destination wedding. The chapel Jesse and I were married in sits on the water and as we left the ceremony, we came outside to find a beautiful rainbow stretching over the river. I knew exactly who had something to do with that rainbow! =)
I adore my brother's chocolate lab pup "Doc", I really do, but damn. Spending my weekend dealing with his toilet accidents- not to mention his hyperactivity- is the last thing I want to do after working all week.
Also during the Obama presidency, Romney purchased a home in La Hoya, California because, as he said, “I wanted to be where I could hear the waves,”
When things go wrong as they sometimes will,
I'm not going to write a review of either film, Suckerpunch has a shite storyline...LACK OF STORY and Your Highness was just a pile of drivel that was funny in certain scenes like when the Prince had a Minotaur's trouser snake as a necklace...WTF o_O
Score!
Highly increased incidence of non-Hodgkin's lymphoma in ME/CFS, or to be more precise, the incidence rate of non-Hodgkin's lymphoma is 0.02% in the United States, yet nearly 5% of ME/CFS patients develope the disease.
All entries should be submitted by Wednesday, March 7th midday QLD Australia time. All entries must be posted in the gallery to be eligible for prizes and Top Three. Entries can be submitted up until you can no longer see the gallery available. After that time the gallery is hidden so the team can place their votes for the top 3!
I Ad-Lib when I read to them. And, yes, I still use silly voices when reading to my high school age boys. The section kept talking about our SUPERSTRUCTURE and I always said it like a super-hero with a deep voice speaking in a tunnel....
Last week I took a couple of my students to a banquet hosted by a local science and engineering community, and something one of the speakers said really stuck with me:
One practical writing space practically handed on to another creative person. Not magic, not biography, not - heaven preserve us - "inspiration." And certainly not requiring half a million pounds. I imagine a pint changed hands in an Oxford pub or perhaps a bottle of wine was given. I like that story better.
I quite like it.
“Everything COMMON I know about!!!!”
We are at The Impact Zone, Mike Tenay and Taz welcome us to the show.
As we said before, so say I now again: If any man preach any other gospel unto you than that which ye have received, let him be accursed! (1:9)
T: Ah jeez I dunno Aaron! (laughs). I think you need to be able to do it all, the web site, the marketing, the commerce side of it….but at the end of the day, you have to have that unique quality or x-factor as well; that part hasn’t changed since way back in the day. But the speed that tastes can change now is crazy, so many tunes and groups can sound the same, but only a very small percentage make it beyond they’re garage. The notion of what a hit song is has really changed, and continues to change a lot. But you must be a video star these days if you really want to make it. Everyone doing music has a video on YouTube, from million dollar productions to very simple “high concept” efforts. Single artists can pop out of nothing, but there are no successful bands anymore where someone just “finds” them… a band tours, writes good songs, works a good fan base, and keeps at it. And staying humble…too many bands fall victim to their friends pumping them up a bit too much. Overall they have to remain professional, and treat it like a business, respecting themselves and being serious about it.
In the forward galley, the lead flight attendant, a big smile on her face, is handing me paper towels as I walk through door L-1. She tells me captains are not supposed to get wet... Technically correct, but I have a sharp co-pilot and would rather keep him warm and dry. He can get the flight deck ready for the next leg while I work the sympathy angle with a pretty, young flight attendant who thinks pilots are cool. She is still a new hire and will change her opinion in a few months.
The Raiders don’t need an All-Pro at quarterback this season. They need competence. At 28, Jason Campbell is seasoned enough to learn yet another offense and young enough to still give the Raiders a career. With the young weapons he’ll have around him, the future should be something to look forward to.
Routinely we are told that this is the Worst Squad In Living Memory. Those making such claims haven’t been alive that long, this is still light years ahead of the mid-1970s, post-Brady pre-Graham 1980s and 1994-95. Finish third – yes that is progress if last season was fourth – and goals conceded will be the problem. Remove the freak occurrence at Old Trafford and they have actually conceded less goals per game than last season, barely creeping over a goal per game.
Pot here plays the role of first husband of girl and hence it is a non living thing so as per the Indian Mythology this becomes null and void and the wedding with the Human is considered as her first wedding. Pot has taken all the Dosh or troubles of the Girl and hence the Mangal will not effect the other person anymore.
God Bless the USA, and all who honestly call it home--johnnyb
Oh, but I haven't even begun explaining the plot yet.
It's just turned midnight here, which means it's officially Christmas eve! I shouldn't be surprised, but it seems like it's snuck up on me again! We have a full house of Aussie friends and family here in Madrid for Christmas. There won't be any snow this year (devastated!), but it's cold and we're enjoying the northern hemisphere approach to the season's festivities. In Spain, there's not much Santa Claus - it's all about the nativity. Instead of "merry christmas", Spaniards say "feliz navidad", which literally translates to "happy nativity". Christmas day is similar to the way we celebrate, but no gifts are given. That is done on 6 January when the three wise men apparently came to give gifts to Jesus. We can't wait that long - we'll be doing gifts in Christmas day! Our letter to Santa this year included instructions about how to find us in Spain - just to be sure (this was very important to Little Mister Yardage).
Sitting through two games today was a lot of soccer if you ask me. It was 55 degrees, but windy, and I was COLD. I'm a fair weather spectator at best.
are always between
This is the quilt top I'm talking about - I have a love-hate relationship with this quilt so I'll be glad to finish it.
A counterbalance to the extra work involved in dual ethnic lessons and effort, is the bonus Mixed parents get from having kids who know instinctively what it means to blend and see many sides, to have a kid who is automatically able to cross ethnic lines when others can’t. And it is great to have a kid that is the walking embodiment of the ultimate social goal of cultural diversity and people seeing each other for more than their skin color.
PRIZE 7 - 2 large sets of LOTV Sentiments
Every year, May 3rd is a date which celebrates the fundamental principles of press freedom; to evaluate press freedom around the world, to defend the media from attacks on their independence and to pay tribute to journalists who have lost their lives in the exercise of their profession.
“No remorse, no I’m sorry, nothing but hate,” Debbie said.
I don’t want WoW to be “hard” again. I just want WoW to acknowledge that their players are changing. I don’t want to exclude anyone, see, because I’ve felt excluded for a year now. I don’t want WoW to be inaccessible to new players due to difficulty, and I don’t want raiding to be accessible to everyone regardless of skill. I want the game to truly be for everyone, not just a priesthood. Koster continues his previous thought with this
Liber Primus:
Hope everyone has a fantastic weekend. We are expecting a huge warm up here in PA, so me thinks there may be some outdoor time in my near future!
There is one notable point on Outskirts Press submissions. They require a $35 refundable deposit with all submissions, which ultimately is used as a part payment against the chosen publishing package. One can only assume that this is either to prevent time-wasting submissions by authors who will never actually contract to Outskirts, or is a way of ‘sealing’ the author/publishing partnership. It is not something I am uncomfortable with and may reflect an urgency on their part to get an author's signature. Outskirts then assign a publishing representative and advise the author on their submission by email and also by an available direct phone line. To be fair to Outskirts Press, there are an abundance of POD publishers in the industry who are far too quick to lay their hands on the author’s cheque before even a cursory glance is given to the submitted manuscript/PDF file.
The purpose of the operation seems to be designed to improve access for heavy machinery along Bonscombe Lane to Mr Wood’s nearby road stone business complex. Mr Wood is a highly-valued sub-contractor for Dorset County Council. He is noted for a robust commercial style, which some find intimidating. He remains, even so, high on the list of County Hall’s Best Friends.
7.) Do you think other life forms exist in the universe?
And they soundin' sharp
Reader’s of the Healthymemory Blog should be aware that these examples of successful aging are due to their continuing to engage their attentional and System Two processes (See the Healthymemory Blog Posts “Review of the Washington Post’s The Aging Brain, More on Attention and Cognitive Control,”, “Passing 65,” “Memory and Aging,” and The Two System View of Cognition.” ) (Note that clicking on the hyperlinks will take you to other articles and not the Healthymemory Blog Posts. To read the posts, enter the title in the blogs Search Box.)
E: painting an owl for you
Sleeping
But I would be remiss to look ahead to the SFSFF's July festival without pointing out that there are still tickets available for their once-in-a-generation screenings of Kevin Brownlow's reconstruction of Abel Gance's Napoléon at the palatial Paramount Theatre in Oakland. The festival's website has all the information you might need about this presentation, including an indispensable set of Frequently Asked Questions; the answers are an extremely compelling argument that anyone who loves film should attend at least one of these screenings. Which one? If you're the sort of hedging cinephile who waits to see what's happening at all the local film venues before committing to any one ticket, wait no more; pretty much everything has been announced. Check the Film On Film Foundation calendar for that week and see if there's not a day of the four (Mar, 24, 25, 31 & April 1) that you can make seeing Napoléon your priority. I don't want to hear any of my readers complaining a year or a decade from now that you didn't realize how unique and overpowering these screenings are likely to be, and therefore missed out. Even Hugo director Martin Scorsese is stumping for Napoléon. In a brief article written on the film for the latest issue of Vanity Fair he says the 1927 epic is "unlike anything made before or since. Gance ushered in every technical innovation imaginable."
02. I Wanna Be Me
So for the rest of the week we stayed at the hospital. You met your big brother, we worked on nursing, mommy worked on healing and we just spent our days and nights feeding you, loving you and learning how to be your mommy and daddy. You passed lots of tests like car seat challenges, hearing tests, temperature tests, weight checks and all of that. You passed them all! On Friday morning we learned that everybody was looking good and we had been released to go home. We happily packed up all of our stuff and checked out. As we were leaving the hospital with our cart load of gifts, flowers, stuff, &two car seats loaded with babies I still did not believe it. I could not believe you were really coming home with me. We said thank you and goodbye to all of our wonderful nurses and made our way home.
We’ve all heard that phrase many times. And we all know what it means: it’s a cynical retort to someone who thinks that something is going to happen.
Salamander Energy plc’s News Details, L15/43 31
One participant who was just on his way to the town hall was Dawud Walid, who heads the Michigan office of the Council on American Islamic Relations, a civil rights advocacy group for Muslims.
Obviously, appealing to lifestyle concerns is the foundation of condo marketing. No surprises here. I guess where the fun comes in with this one is that it goes a step further than the usual “own the lifestyle” fluff. This ad implies there’s a lack of advantage in living in other regions in Greater Vancouver. To live the north shore advantage as opposed to what? The Marpole disadvantage? The Surrey contempt? The Burnaby compromise? Please Adera stop, you’re being mean!
I’m bringing the art of alfresco back – its economical, intimate and embraces the great outdoors. I even found a vintage picnic basket quilted with red gingham interior. It will be overflowing with fresh baguettes, ripe cheeses, stuffed olives, soprassata and a few bottles of vino. I might even wrap some cantaloupe in prosciutto. Yum.
day3 and day4: basic stretch pants
2. An Increase in small local Cheese makers will spark interest in Beer and Cheese pairings.
09. You are my Sister
The recipe is actually for sauteed peaches, but we had over two pounds (thanks, Costco) of strawberries that were basically begging to be used, so I threw them in with the peaches. This recipe can really be tweaked for individual servings, larger servings - whatever you want, but it is delicious and ready in less than five minutes!
Gnadenhutten is an Ohio town whose name makes me a little nervous. I don’t know what it means, Gnadenhutten. Sounds scary!
On the draft side, 15-18 taps will pour NABC beers. Another 8 – 10, maybe more, will pour Louisville-brewed beers and a sizeable contingent of beers brewed by Brewers of Indiana Guild member breweries. It is my desire to become an unofficial Louisville metro taproom for BIG, and in the process, offer a selection of under-appreciated beers from a state that, after all, has had two books published about its breweries this year, with a third on the way in early 2011.
"A small piece"
Lastly, has anyone seen the new Harry Potter movie? If you're planning to go, a word of advice. Take Kleenex. Especially if you've read the books, because you'll be able to appreciate what's happening on a deeper level. Yes, there are changes and differences, but it's still a wonderful ending to the series. I want to go back.
While most of us fall into the category of “could have climbed a little higher on the life ladder if we’d only had a tad more nerve and the discipline to forego 10-20 fewer Saturday night keggers,” there are some people who come into this world as a force of nature. There’s no doubt these little suckers are going somewhere…it’s just a semi-frightening matter of whether they choose to use their powers for good or evil.
I liked reading a young adult novel with a male main character - there seem to be much more young adult books out featuring female characters right now, or maybe all the covers with pretty girls in pretty dresses is just misleading. Anyway, despite this, I didn't like Jackson at first. In the beginning of the book, he and Adam are conducting an "experiment" that involves Jackson flirting with a cashier, to see if she remembers it when he comes back to the present. I'm not a fan of people flirting with other people when they are in a relationship, so this made me not too keen on either Jackson or Adam for coming up with this plan, but the more I read, the better I liked them both. I really enjoyed Holly, too, and while it might be complicated, I hope to see some more of Courtney and Jenni Stewart. Cross has created characters that you come to really care about. It's really an excellent debut novel.
We need to realise that as advertisers, we are no longer initiating the conversation with consumers – we are trying to become part of the conversation that these people are already having with each other.
This is the goal: to get into your soul
So how do you live, and stay sane and productive in-between?
lily: can we pray now? let's tell jesus happy almost birthday.
I cannot say I am truly experiencing culture shock in Spain. I am purely disillusioned. I feel more frustrated than shocked because everything I am “shocked” about I can compare to the US. Both countries have Wi-Fi, but I cannot connect in Spain because it will only connect to one computer at a time. I was fortunate to get a kitchen in Spain, but unfortunate to get a kitchen without utensils. My cold room came with a heater, but also with roommates telling me I couldn’t use it because it was too expensive. Spain has everything that America has, but I just can’t use the utilities.
It’s those last eight words that are the killer, moving us from mundane if observant description to the suggestion of something wild, uncontrolled and destructive. Because Phillips plants that little seed here, right at the start of the piece, the later events of the story – incest, teenage pregnancy, possible infanticide – don’t strike us as totally implausible.
Mildly forlorn, the two charm their way into a party being held at a mansion owned by Dirk Zebra (Jack DeLeon), an important mover and shaker in the festering cesspool that is show business. The party, featuring the expressive Magie Song (Dr. Caligari) and The Fibonaccis (credited here as Sexy Holiday) as the swanky shindig's poolside entertainment (they perform "Slow Beautiful Sex" and a cover of "Purple Haze"), follows Lucy and Rosalind as they schmooze the hell out of the eclectic crowd. (I spotted a Nina Hagen lookalike who had a gutless worm on a leash and a couple copulating near a barbecue.) All their aggressive schmoozing pays off when the gals land themselves a valeting gig at Mr. Zebra's next party. In reality, Mr. Zebra falls under the spell of Rosalind, and who wouldn't? She's radiant and her an eye-popping gold blazer was off the charts in terms of garment visibility. Anyway, this upsets a trio of male valets from Fraternity Parking, who, after being fired ("no more gorgeous girls and free cocaine"), plan to exact an elaborate revenge on their female rivals at Mr. Zebra's next party (the guy, as we soon find out, likes to throw his share of parties).
A little while ago, she hosted a fabric giveaway on her blog featuring fabrics from the Kate Spain Terrain collection. I had my fingers and toes and everything crossed as I desperately wanted to win (I mean seriously... all those pinks and oranges were screaming my name).
So the next time you and your significant other are feeling romantic, don’t go out of town–just rent a room at the Driskill for the weekend. If you’re really lucky maybe the ghost of LBJ will materialize, show you his appendectomy scar, and lecture you about the Great Society.
# 2 West yuanmingyuan Road, Beijing 100193 China
....so happy with the way they came out, and when I was making these, I wasn't quite sure what I was going to do, but they definitely helped me with their fun images and phrases.
I also want to take this opportunity to acknowledge the phenomenal job done by SCC staff and interns in helping organize the seniors. Amy Harmon, Jared McCannell, Laura Stevens (our intern from SDSU), Enrique Gonzalez (who was here at 5am to accommodate television) and Gloria Torain deserve huge accolades. Our PR team from Scatena Daniels (Arika and Denise) did a fantastic job generating coverage on Channels 6 (every half hour between 5am and 8am), Channel 10, Channel 39, Univision (Spanish), KPBS, the U-T and the Op-Ed in Voice of San Diego.
Well the reality is, Christmas is EASY to miss...if you're not careful! The joy in a child's eyes...opportunities to give to those less fortunate...freshly fallen snow...singing carols down the halls of the local nursing home or hospital....celebrating the birth of Jesus...these can all be quickly overlooked if we don't stop and take the time to truly see the wonder of this special time of year.
My heart went out to it. So many times, you see crushed turtles on the road. They simply can’t move quickly enough to escape the rushing traffic.
Isn’t that at least half of the Bill of Rights under assault?
11-Standin' Around Crying
Next, an update: I've since made the big leap back to the United States, no easy feat for an ex-pat abroad. (It may come as a surprise to some that it is much easier to find a way to go away than it is to find a way to return.) For now, I am traveling around the United States, visiting family members, taking on freelance, and doing research for various future projects. After completing an itinerary that will take me through the Catskills, Salt Lake City, Idaho's Salmon River (where the above photo was taken), Denver, NYC and Boston, I'll be moving to Buffalo, NY for the fall to be closer to family and to begin some of said projects. I can't divulge the details yet, but these will undoubtedly involve food, travel, language and education.
It is important that this report be evaluated hand in hand with the latest DOE Integrated Database Report (US Spent Nuclear Fuel And Radioactive Waste Inventories, Projections and Characteristics), referred to as IDB in the following comments. High-level waste inventories in the IDB are noted as of Dec. 31, 1994 at 958.8 million curies at only 4 specific locations: Savannah River, Idaho National Engineering Laboratory, Hanford and the former West Valley, New York reprocessing site. In view of the missing inventories of spent fuel and high-level waste discussed elsewhere in this section of RADNET, it is essential that the following footnote on page 15 in the IDB be noted by anyone concerned about the environmental remediation of source points of radioactive contamination documented in this report: “DOE IS UNDERTAKING SEVERAL INITIATIVES TO BETTER DEFINE THE VOLUMES AND TYPES OF WASTES CURRENTLY IN STORAGE AT ENVIRONMENTAL RESTORATION SITES AND THOSE WHICH MAY BE GENERATED DURING FUTURE REMEDIATION ACTIVITIES ACROSS THE ENTIRE DOE COMPLEX. THIS INFORMATION, WHICH SHOULD BECOME AVAILABLE IN A FEW YEARS, WILL BE INCLUDED IN FUTURE REVISIONS OF THIS REPORT.” (pg. 15). This means that the inventories of high-level waste (958.8 x 106Ci), transuranic wastes (2.67 x 106Ci), and low-level waste (23.5 x 106Ci) listed in the IBD DO NOT INCLUDE THE HUGE VOLUMES OF UNCONTAINED WASTES OF EVERY DESCRIPTION GENERATED AND DISCHARGED at the many DOE environmental restoration sites listed in this publication.
You know you have an over abundance of scraps, here's your chance to do something with them. You've got two weeks go check it out here
I do have a feeling though that going to school in the States, so close to the outlets and major mall is going to be DANGEROUS!!!!!!!
Wet scallops are commonly treated with Phosphates which is a preservative. When scallops are soaked in phosphates, they absorb water making them weigh more and thereby costing you more. (Take in mind, that you are paying for added water.) The absorbed water evaporates during cooking and, in turn, shrinks your scallops leaving them smaller, dry and somewhat tasteless. Furthermore, the added water does not let scallops brown properly during cooking. It is generally easy to discern treated scallops as they will usually appear snow-white in color.
It happened four blocks from where they work, here at The Virginian-Pilot.
Just try telling that to my Lutheran upbringing. By the day after Christmas, I was riddled with guilt about being so unproductive. Disrepair surrounded me at every turn, and yet trying to impose order on my decaying home by doing “chores” seemed so contrary to the holiday/vacation spirit. Sure, I might feel compelled to turn the tap off after getting a glass of water, or combing my hair every few days, but any more responsibility and civilization than that was too much trouble.
Lilly has now made tracks out of the saloon and over to the other nuns who have gathered in the street. The nuns round up a few men and they all head over to the saloon and up to the room. Evelyn is warning Jonah to leave Salvation, the town is run by Sister Agatha and he MUST get away. Just then, Sister Sarah bursts in and tells Evelyn that lying is a sin, worse than trying to bed Jonah for her own pleasure (this according to Lilly). One of the men punches Jonah and he retaliates, tempers flare and guns are raised. Evelyn jumps in front of Jonah and confesses that she tried to bed Jonah but he refused, he is no sinner. Sarah states that Agatha will decide that.
rhinestones also from the never ending stash, as is the ribbon.
Because of my health issues right now, we will be having a little celebration on Sunday.
You may fail, but you’ll fail on your terms. Oh, and failure WILL come. So will rejection, so will disappointment. Get up and carry on anyway, in spite of them.
It’s also a supreme pleasure to eat. This isn’t just finger-food — hummus is a major player. It dresses up, dresses down, and pairs with just about everything.
I waited patiently for the cake to cool before I could perform an autopsy as I was very anxious to see the colour........ and was most delighted to be greeted with a nice cool purple!
WHERE AM I? AND WHO ARE THESE PEOPLE?! I mean really, am I the one on crazy pills around this joint?!
September is a great time to get back to walking. The scenery is beautiful, and I am motivated to get in some walking now, before winter makes it nearly impossible.
“I think the reason I haven’t heard from them is I told them, ‘Call me after the bowl’. I’m really focused on this bowl right now. Then I’ll talk to my family as far as what we should do and then after that.”
The 14.4 million Pesos worth of rice wasted each day can feed many Filipinos. That fact must be enough for us to re-evaluate the way we eat. Cook only what is enough for the meal, our mother always remind us.
Born Frank Luther Crow Lakin, Kansas, he was raised in Bakersfield, California. A trained pianist, he moved to New York City in 1928 to pursue a career in music. A country music singer, he was one of the first "Urban Cowboys", performimg country music at big city clubs as "Frank Luther and his Pards." He is remembered as the composer of "Barnacle Bill The Sailor" written with Carson Robison.
In season I pick and dry my own nettle. This year I also dried red clover blossoms and red raspberry leaves. The rest I buy from Anna's Vitamins Plus (250-260-1147). I can buy them there in bulk in 1 lb bags. 1 lb of oatstraw or nettle fills up a gallon jar and lasts me more than a month. She is happy to ship, as well.
Patrick:"You're at the amiss abode then."
Once again, I am sorely tempted to add another tidbit of choice music. And, lookie - I gave in to temptation.
But in the absence of understanding, “doing your assigned duty” is better than “doing nothing”.
He was broken.
( I wonder what next step I can take NOW, to keep changing the way I am. )
He saw a chamber with a deep stream running through the center. It was oddly shaped, and many corners were obscured by shadow or bends in the natural walls. There were dimly glowing blue crystals, common in the natural caverns about these parts, that provided dim light to the chamber. There seemed to be nothing threatening so the party moved forward until they all stood in one small section of the chamber separated from the rest by the deep stream. Some one (or thing) had fastened a rope to hang from the ceiling over the center of the twenty foot wide stream, and with it, it would be possible to swing to one of the other three sections of chamber. In two of those sections, the keen eyed Halfling spotted shivering squelching globs of ooze that were shaking themselves to full wakefulness as the party entered.
Let me open my eyes and see her.
So the upshot is, I'm going to enter it. It might not be good enough to win, but you never know what the judges are looking for and it's definitely an acceptable beer.
Hello there!! I have some fun news to share so I thought I would stop by but before I do let me back up for a minute.
Preheat the oven to gas mark 4 / 180c.
when i was in London, i get around via the tube (LRT version London), when i was in Barcelona and Rome, i took the bus, when i was in Amsterdam, i took the tram and when i was in Paris, i took the metro (LRT version Paris).
So what has this week been about? I handed in my second assignment at the beginning of the week and I've just finished the second placement of my nursing course (only seven left to go!) and while I'm pretty sure that I don't want to be a health visitor(!), it was a really interesting placement nonetheless and certainly gave me food for thought. Besides which, my mentor was absolutely lovely and it was a very pleasant six weeks :) back to uni again this week for another block of theory in the run up to our exams in December - eek!
My station was in rural Kentucky and there wasn't too much by way of entertainment around there. After struggling to nickle and dime it for years they hooked up with a professional promoter, rented a gymnasium, had us dress up in our dress uniforms, and once a week we had the biggest, baddest Bingo around. Big jackpots, refreshments, professional callers, and firefighters selling bingo sheets ... it was a hit. Such a hit that we started running out of room to seat people.
Dark chocolate melt & squeeze topping
東京ディズニーランドと違って、東京ディズニーシーはアルコールドリンクが購入可能なんですよね。私は子供が一緒だったため、飲みませんでしたが、きっと大人同士で行って飲みながらショーを見たり、乗り物に乗ったら楽しいのだろうなと思いました。
outside lust and greed came between u n me... REALITY!!!
Donnelly couldn’t say who is gaining potential lost sales, but that he suspects HBC’s share is “moving among” the other original equipment manufacturers (OEMs).
Would you say that you have ever wrestled with God? If so, with what and how did it turn out ? (if your wrestling is over)
home to my parents,
5- If I had more time I would have loved to be able to have somebody with a hand-held mic but we had an issue bringing the sound from the cam and into the mic headset. I need to do more R&D on this.
The topics going on in Jeremy Mora’s work -- urbanism, the status of ancient objects, religion, museum displays, and the end of the world arrive in tiny packages, usually bound up with undercurrent of ecological awareness and deadpan humor. Most of his materials are found objects. Hollywood, 2006 offers discarded pourstone as metaphor for a pulverized L.A, its Hollywood sign in disrepair. Can You Hear Me Know, 2006 is found plaster, pencil lead, and a contact lens constructed into a empty, unpopulated world where communication as failed. All together, the sculptures do not form a coherent narrative, but instead many events are suggested and then the outcome is left quiet.
It requires no modification of the Epson Artison 810 that I purchased it for.
"I should get up, write things down," I think.
2 Rolling Thunder 4:03
Joan always had an ear for songs. The covers she chooses, and invariably executes perfectly, are a big part of Joan's draw. Her versions of Jonathan Richmonds' Roadrunner, Sly Stone's Everyday People, Tommy James' Crimson And Clover, and especially the Mary Tyler Moore show theme Love Is All Around are all killer renditions.
I wanted to share this story with my old readers and new readers alike, because that’s what I’m doing here, sharing my story and my journey. But I also wanted to share this story because I want to remind anyone reading to listen to your intuition. Pay attention to signs. The universe tells us things, subtly sometimes, and it’s our job to take note.
Day 2 in New York – We started off with breakfast at Crumbs Bake Shop. Scrumptious is all I have to say! I got part of an apple ring with hazelnut iced coffee and Leanne got a cappuccino and a mixed berry muffin. The good thing about Crumbs is that is like a block away from Macy’s which is where we were planning on shopping that afternoon.
P.S.: This is a sponsored post. A little while ago, Catherine, who works for an advertising agency, contacted me and asked if I was willing to publish an article on her behalf, including some links. Well, this is it, I sincerely hope it doesn't bother you, but I was actually taken down the memory lane as I really used to own a pair of shoes like the one above. I can't remember whether they were actually Kickers, but I loved them and completely wore them out!
when one might order 'off the menu'
I am a huge fan of Cat and Bones from the Night Huntress series by Frost, and I'm missing reading about them. However, her Night Huntress World stand alones are just as good, and more than enough to tide me over. Eternal Kiss of Darkness is no exception; another brilliant novel!
After feeling a little house bound today, the kids and I headed down the street for a bit of Op shopping. We only went to one of the biggest ones (which, really isn't that big). We weren't disapointed though, we scored all the above for $7.50! The Prince was very excited with his find, a castle that opens up and has four rooms, a set of wooden trees and people, a construction man and an alien that lights up. He has called it 'The Castle of Dooooooom!'.
April Fool's Day has been observed for centuries. It's been famously said that the term refers to adherents to the old Julian Calendar after the introduction of the corrected Gregorian calendar; New Year was celebrated on March 25 under the old calendar, and those seen celebrating at the end of the week long holiday were said to be called April Fools. Likely this story is wrong, but the day has long been notorious for practical jokes like the time in 1698 when people showed up at the Tower of London "to see the lions being washed".
Well, what do you expect from
OK, back to sending up those house prayers.
2 Tbls. Baking Powder
Pull your name from a hat
She was our first child,” recalls Tammy a mother of two who lives in North Canada. “But from age three we knew something was wrong. She was very introverted, isolated. When she started school at four she came home and said she was a freak. It seemed a strange word for a four-year-old to use. She was always quite a sad little person.”
The House of Representatives has approved CISPA, a controversial bill that will give the government additional levers to monitor the Internet. But what are its chances of being passed into law, and what will it mean for Internet users?
Now, however, further research by The Slog suggests the geopolitics line of enquiry may be hardening somewhat.
Whenever Sinful Colors go on sale for .99 cents, which is quite frequently, I load up. I know that some of their colors can be hit or miss, but for the most part, I've had pleasant experiences with their brand. This spring, they released the Cast Away collection, themed after a luxurious Greek vacation.
Bottle of Wine....Fireballs
Current, primitive examples of engineering biology rely on an ad hoc, laborious, trial-and-error process, wherein one successful project does not inform subsequent, new designs. This approach combined with the complexity of biological systems restricts current, one-off efforts to modifying only a small set of genes and constructing simple, isolated genetic circuits and metabolic pathways
But this algorithm didn’t find many supporters in our group. So I ended up ordering a ton of pretty good Thai food enough for two people (there was just one dish). What is strange is that Alaska seemed to be teaming with Thai places (no Russian food this year at all). Anchorage had them, Fairbanks, this Denali village. I mean, I’m not against Thai food, but why Thai? Strange. I didn’t know Thai people can even handle that cold (joke).
I'm not a fan of knitting from charts, so I knew I had to find the perfect pattern, something that had instructions written out. I found Traveling Woman and I liked the stockinette with the lace border, it was really pretty.
I didn't wait long enough to let this dry before I added top coat to middle and ring fingers.
September 20 - Robert Whitaker, photographer (Beatles "butcher" album cover), 71
That fact doesn’t bother the United Nations Framework Convention on Climate Change’s carbon trading desk, which at a Bonn meeting just offered Moosa chair of the “High-Level Panel on the Clean Development Mechanism Policy Dialogue”. The panel will almost certainly attempt to justify carbon trading, the privatisation of the air, in spite of repeated European emissions-market episodes of fraud and corruption, not to mention a dramatic price crash.
My husband, who was sent over there,
I can hear the police sirens beyond the madness but don’t care and I don't stop hitting. Long before the policemen pull me off the ground, I can see the dancing blue from the corner of me good eye.
**DISCLAIMER!**
Explore and practicalize with un-ending imagination, the world impossible is just a word, failure in something should gear you up to conquer and succeed in that thing. And, in whatever we do, give your possible maximum best. In the scenario i gave above, both succeeded. None is a failure after all, their results was a reflection of their inputs. But, one of them could have succeeded the more. The only thing stopping him, was himself and his limiting potentials.
And, unlike every other morn,
and that I would not pack away the decor until then.
Ready to serve.Garnish with fried shallots
You would think that my children would be filled with gratitude for the, frankly, top notch mothering that they receive. So much so that they worship and adore their Mummy darling and their every waking moment is dedicated to thanking me for my efforts, they are fulsome in their praise, compliments drip honeyedly from their lips, because they think I'm worth it.
The author discusses prominent characters of the Indian Epic and the moral dilemmas, behaviours that they exhibit as the story of mahabharata progresses. The tone of the narrative is neutral. The author does not favour any one side or any particular character of the epic. In every chapter, the author compares the mahabharata situations with current day scenarios. He provides a thorough analysis of what can be argued as righteous and why is it so difficult to be righteous. As per hindu philosophy a human life(purushartha) consists of four phases – Dharma(righteousness), Arth(career,goals,commercial activities), Kama(pleasures), Moksha(renunciation). Without experiencing all four a person remains incomplete. Out of the four this book stresses on Dharma and why is it difficult to follow Dharma. The book is deeply introspective. A person who connects with mahabharata and is looking to derive the meaning of life hidden in the story will enjoy reading this excellent narrative/debate on Mahabharata. The author is fascinated(not biased towards) with Yudhishtira’s character and hence the title – “The subtle art of DHARMA” (Yudhishtira being the son of Dharma). The central theme of the book is Dharma.
I did look out for any blog land friends whilst at Ally Pally, but saw NO ONE. I had a great time though, always do.
You had me right down
Rain: In the event of rain, the screening will be rescheduled for September 10th.
The expedition wandered through modern-day Arkansas and Louisiana for nearly a year until finally it became clear to everyone, including the Governor, that no fortunes would be found. Resigned, exhausted and ailing, de Soto proposed that his army return to the Mississippi, build boats and float down the river, then send a barge to Cuba for help.
The recent Council of Australian Governments’ commitment and the commitment by education ministers to advance this work is welcome. It needs to be undertaken in full view of the public, Catholic and independent school interests and with their participation.
TD: Leadership can be defined as one’s ability to get others to willingly follow. Every organisation needs leaders at every level. Leaders can be found and nurtured if you look for the following character traits.
-- Written and photographed by Brian Major
It doesn’t always work. Most business owners have experienced failures. They bought two cups of coffee and couldn’t find buyers.
AllergySuperStore.com is part of drugstore.com.
A friend from high school you and I shielded ourselves from the pain of adolescence.
She enjoyed knitting, and loved arts and crafts. She also was a great cook and loved her grandkids.
The binary based western concept of religion, he suggests, is not the best framework for understanding experiential Mayan cosmology or practice. Using ethnographic, archaeological, and glyphic evidence, he traces modern Mayan attitudes toward ritually charged objects and imagery back to the Classic Maya. No scholar of Mesoamerican religion, archaeology, or history can afford to overlook this long overdue approach to a widely misunderstood subject.
I have to ask, why did the team have to be 'so far ahead' in order for David to have an opportunity to 'play some minutes'?
But now I'm not sure. The very question evinces doubt. I slept on it, troubled, probably muttering, and grinding my teeth.
I’m hopeful that some of you NC Science Festival fans will be able to enlighten me. Is it hand-cranked? Run by some sort of motor?
He is going into the Navy's highly regarded nuclear propulsion program.
One of the main takeaways from the in-depth study is that search engines are more popular than ever. We’re not surprised, but the stats back up the assumptions. Pew says “in January 2002, 52 percent of all Americans used search engines. In February 2012 that figure grew to 73% of all Americans.”
Even in travel, you’ll want to get from point A to point B as quickly as possible. You’ll find the optimal route, and you’ll use the fastest mount you can. If you have 5 quests to complete in 5 different locations, you’ll figure out the optimal order in which to complete them as to minimize the traveling time.
I have a 2 Bedroom townhome and am in the middle of my building, so I got lucky with only having 9 windows. STILL this is expensive when considering blinds. I searched all stores around town and finally came across Mirada, Home View brand at Home Depot.
Today’s recommended CD is TASSILI by the band TINARIWEN.
This weekend is going to be rather busy.
I am disappointed with Barnes & Noble, and how they have decided to use the age rating of CommonSenseMedia.
Also, I was really happy when I logged on today and saw that I now have 35 followers! Thanks so much guys! :-D
His strength was that he wasn’t willing to be swept along in any religious movement. He wasn’t gullible. He wouldn’t be easily deceived. The world needs people like that who can look at all the options and then make the right choices. They are not easily carried away on the spur of the moment. We see this in Thomas earlier in the ministry of Jesus, when Jesus told them that He was going to wake up Lazarus from sleep. He meant that He was going to bring Lazarus back to life. Thomas recognized that Jesus would be walking into dangerous situation.
in my own thought patterns.
Attitude
What is heartbreaking is that there are no answers for the moment, and unless and until we all start teaching our children that it race matters not, that ethnicity matters not, that we are all in this tighter – from the parent, to the teacher, to the politician to the entertainer, then we will get nowhere. Is there racism, absolutely, however, what are we doing, as nation, as a people to eradicate produce? Do we feel that it’s the “other” person’s responsibility? Perhaps it is naiveté that longs for a nation that ran in what appeared to be the beginnings of a “utopia” – where the civil rights legislation that was passed and signed into law by President Johnson (screaming and kicking all the way there), was that not the beginning of the end of the separation of the nation? Even though a sensible and reasonable person understood that there would be ignorance and bigotry still, would not the majority overrule that perception and with time eradicate the notion that we are separate because we are so “different”.
More pecan waffles over here, please!
I like my recipes with history and my history with stories so both books filled me with yearning for places still to come.
I'm not sure if you've noticed but I'm not on as many design teams right now, we weren't sure how much time and traveling we will have to do for my husbands prostate cancer treatments so I didn't renew my design team commitments. I didn't want to disappoint anyone by not meeting design team deadlines. We've had an out of town appointment almost every week for several weeks now and they will continue until at least the end of April when he has the Brachetherapy. There will be follow up appointments in the future too. I do have good news about his prostate cancer though, we've been told it's in the beginning stages and curable.
Pies. My baking nemesis.
i keep listening to fatty boom boom, and it’s such a beautiful anti-american diatribe. hey fatty boom boom, hit me with the ching ching. wow. nothing like being respected by the artists who are singing for you. no wonder you zombies can’t hear the good stuff. it strikes a nerve. the ball side of a ball peen hammer concentrates the force on the point of a sphere, which can do more damage than the flatter face. arcs are cool.
I have to say, I haven't been freaked out by this at all. I'm not welcoming bad news or anything, but I have just been going along, doing each procedure. I told Brian I'd be fine, and that I would just go alone to the procedure. One of my super closest friends wouldn't allow it. In fact, she may have thought I was a little crazy...
Most of you can not honestly say that you have not of crossed certain “Lines” in your lifetime/times upon this Earth. Rather it be something simple as a Lie to more serious of things that we will not mention, I think we can all picture these just fine. With that being of said, you also find a “Appreciation” within the “Not” so comfortable experiance and or BEings upon this journey. BUT it is also soul growth THRU and with ALL things and BEings created by Creator. ALL things are COMBINED as ONE when you see a full spectrum or as a WHOLE within. The ONLY seperations and divisions are of what YOU upon this Earth have seen/created/allowed/accepted/manipulated/forseen…….and the list goes on……… ONLY you have the FREE-WILL choices to “CHANGE” these things. Chelas you cant rush Fine Art! You are ALL grand artists/creators painting pictures, making harmony, rhythm, succession etc……… upon your OWN paths!
Everything was exquisite, the flavours were delicate and enticing with the spices dancing over your taste buds and never being overpowering – exactly like good Indian food should be. I had never been there before, but it was obvious that Benares was a rather superior Indian restaurant.
I.M. S.T.R.U.G.G.L.I.N. Y.'A.L.L.
Thanks to everyone for reading, commenting, or at least granting me the illusion that people were interested in the over-privileged, run-of-the-mill, corporate expat's life in India. That being said, I still have more to say and reflect upon and will keep posting. I also plan to start a "repat" blog (any ideas for titles are greatly appreciated; the leader in the clubhouse is "Good Bye Delhi, Hello Disney").
- Lea Sheppard (Harris) went to an audition just to accompany a friend and after being encouraged to audition, Paul Feig wrote a new part just for him
I went ahead and changed into some light clothes and my trail running shoes. Everyone looked at me like I was crazy and asked what I was doing. I was dying to check out the trails and see what Mt. Baldy had to offer. So off I went.
Rosdolsky’s work “Engels and the ‘Non-historic Peoples:The National Question in the revolution of 1848”, was published by Critique Books in 1986 (Critique 18-19) in an edition translated and edited by John-Paul Himka.
Citrus fruit
to the Graduate Diploma of Secondary Education, and upon return to mum and dad's, I
I wanted to leave a thick glaze border around the edges, but didn't want a clean line of glaze, so I used an old tee-shirt, and pushed the glaze to the edges of the drawer fronts until I had something I was happy with.
Interest in English Colonial architecture grew tremendously with the restoration of Colonial Williamsburg, Virginia in the early 20th century. A great many suburban homes of the 1930s and 1940s are based on the Colonial Williamsburg model and that influence continues today.
From here awareness shines more and more brightly dissolving within itself any last vestiges of separation and otherness that linger out of habit, revealing awareness shining in and as itself. It doesn’t matter if it is long or slow, for there is nothing to wait for any more, nothing to long for, nothing that is lacking and no-one to wait.
Robyn's Fetish Digital Stamps And More is happy to offer the winner of this challenge 5
I thought it was quite magical. I was on a train with my grandfather. We were on a nine-hour train journey in Norway, and we felt uncomfortable that we couldn't see the mountains. We both said it felt a bit claustrophobic.
white creme. It was thick enough that I only used two coats, which was surprising for a white. It's got a very, very slight cool tone to it that keeps it from being too stark. This isn't like painting your nails with Wite Out.
I know this is going to date me, but I might as well be honest: when I started university, back in (gasp!) the late 1980s, I brought an electric typewriter to school with me. We did have a computer at home—a state-of-the-art 386 PC that ran on MS-DOS—but my dad, himself a university professor, thought I could get by with the typewriter for at least my first year. By second year I had one of his cast-offs, a behemoth that gave off heat like a star going supernova, and once I’d got the hang of all that Shift-F7 crap it did come in pretty handy.
Question, challenge if this country
The “Health vs. Job” argument is perhaps the weakest in the Anti-Tobacco grab-bag of available sound-bytes since it's not really an argument at all.
Utah Jazz. If you like basketball, take the time to catch a game with the Utah Jazz. They are a world-class team with great players. You might even leave the game with a new favorite team!
Their music will appeal to eveyone.
But you did something even worse than that–you sacrificed your own children to those idols! You slaughtered my children, so you could offer them as sacrifices. You were so busy sinning and being a prostitute that you refused to think about the days when you were young and were rolling around naked in your own blood. Now I … say you are doomed! Not only did you do these evil things, but you also built places on every street corner where you disgraced yourself by having sex with anyone who walked by. And you did that more and more every day! To make me angry, you even offered yourself to Egyptians, who were always ready to sleep with you.
1. Music. I can’t recall any form of a sound track. Where was it? This is a strange thing to say because a lot of other reviewers praised the movie’s sound track, but I felt the opposite. It was too quiet. A stronger sound track would have evoked more emotion from me. The movie tried portraying Katniss as a strong character but she was so reserved and quiet that a sound track should have filled the gap.
My blog was discovered during a google search for a dead relative.
But CAIR is far from alone in fueling an international perception of anti-Muslim bias that was raised by Clinton's questioner.
I blame you.
Movement: I had my first kick today that was so hard it hurt a little bit!
And for the City of Marinette,
Then come the light-moderate days, which is the key to working out more than 4 days a week; it’s doable and safe, but you can’t go full throttle every day
On the other side of the bench trellis, are the senna I got from Ben, who blogs at The Deep Middle, a switchgrass, yarrow, 'Paprika', and on the right, helenium autumnale. The lamb's ears and coreopsis were already planted before the tree came down.
Received his usual great big hug last night when he arrived to babysit his six year old friend.
P.S. Compare with this story on Bet El's Ulpana neighborhood and I think you can see how straightforward this was. No schmaltz but the story with almost all-around balance with quotes from all angles.
Moms, Dads, Grandparents we started a forum just for you!! Visit MomsandDadsBeHeard soon! 2010 is a MUST year to be involved. No longer can we sit back and allow our rights to disappear. The 2010 elections will be the deciding factor. Get involved, speak out!
Once the podcast ended, I opted for music that I thought might sooth me. Not even the Doobie Brothers’ “What a Fool Believes” did the trick. I thought that if I sang along, I might divert my own attention away from the headache, but no. It takes too much effort to mimic Michael McDonald’s unique voice.
Deniece Williams ~ Let’s Hear It For the Boy ~ Columbia ~ 1984
I didn’t do ALL of this
I am so sentimental aren't I?! So if you think you have have something you know where I am!!
My dad--he could chop down a huge tree while wearing a J-collar with a broken neck. He could work in the hot sun all day long and never complain. He could run marathons. He could ride his bike longer and faster than Mr. MTL and I ever could--he exhausted us on countless rides. He could do the hardest crossword puzzle of the week in the newspaper and never.give.up until every last blank was filled in. He could read the Christmas story to us every year and always choke up on the words "And she pondered all these things in her heart." He could give you a gentle squeeze with his calloused hands, he could laugh at your bad joke, he could sing off-key but from the heart...he could do all of those things and now, he cannot.
According to Webster's, the noun suffix "-ism" has several meanings. For example, it can mean adherence to a philosophical theory or system -- a Marxist is one who adheres to the principles set forth by Karl Marx, while a polygamist is someone who believes in polygamy.
Then all around from far away across the world he smelled good, healthy things to eat so he gave up being king of where the wide things are.
Its been a slow week with not a lot to say but thought I'd pipe in for a long-time favorite post - Way Back When-esday with Cheryl at Twinfatuation!
The UA's Accelerator Mass Spectrometry Laboratory used radiocarbon dating to determine the age of the Siberian skull.
Green Chilli Sauce- 1 Tbsp
Thank goodness for that because I have no choice but to have a landline since my cell phone rarely comes in at our house. We live out in the boonies and these phones are a must! My boys probably think they’re a “must” because of the Push-to-Talk feature! All of a sudden they have walkie talkies!
Lots of snow- check- nothing a hotel room and a plow guy can't fix
I did manage to get a little scrapping in though, using the wonderful and generous assortment of cardstock that Core'dinations and the stamp set that My Sentiments Exactly sent the Cookin' Up Creations design team to work with.
Hubcaps really do make all the difference on a '96 Sentra.
You blew it. It seemed like your stage was going ok, but right around the end of the first turn the sous told you that you could take off. You considered protesting, but instead you decided to change, have a smoke and get a bite to eat. Sitting down at the bar, you order your food and a drink, and sometime later the chef tells you that you're welcome back anytime...but no job is discussed. And you dont ask about one. Your stage is over, and you wasted it. So how did this happen?
In grammar, as in math, two negatives make a positive. If I say, "I hardly have no flour for the cookie dough," I've used two negatives, hardly and no, to explain the condition of flour in my pantry. This is called a double negative. My sentence becomes a positive statement, indicating to my reader that I do indeed have flour in my pantry.
CPR Verification
Yesterday’s warm soft rain has given way to a cold hard rain, at least to start. When I first stepped outside, I had to listen for a few moments to detect the sound of a bird singing, that changed later during the day. I took very few photos, and I haven’t even downloaded them from the camera as of yet, they are mostly water drops on vegetation shots for the most part. I may add one or two here tonight when I get home from work, it depends on how they came out.
I didn't have any expectations of the trip other than "exploring possibilities." Despite the kind of obsessed craziness I exhibited over the summer, I'd made some great personal strides (more stamina, a lighter possession load, better health thanks to all that homemade bread and a clearer mind after all that jostling from running), and I was open and ready for anything.
Otherworldly psych and alien trance unite in Orchestra Of Spheres' hypnotic jams. The group has been entrancing audiences in their native Wellington and further afield for years, and never fail to leave jaws hanging at their free-spirited but tightly-wound motorik dance. Live, they're a spectacle of concept costumes, handmade instruments including a cake tin guitar and rack of keyboard foot pedals played by hand, and look as though an alien troupe descended the stage. Boltzmann Brain will induce in you their contagious mystic madness.
So, courtesy of Mags,
hairdressers that gossip,
I saw a treasure chest at the bottom of the ocean. It was in a deep, dark place, and I had deposited it there many centuries ago. The chest was more of a box, cast iron. It was sealed shut by rust and covered in barnacles and layers of seaweed. I hauled it out of the water and prised the lid open. Apparently in this incarnation I was a mermaid, and it felt like I had returned to my ancestral home. Opening the box, I found the long forgotten treasure that is my memories and knowledge from past lifetimes. It is now time to embrace my past, bring it into the present, and discard the useless rubbish I have acquired.
Essential oils came into my life in 1991 while I was living in Italy. During my twelve years in Rome, I gave birth to two sons, and it was after the birth of my second son that I had an experience that would change my life.
I don’t watch TV or movies anymore, mostly. But I watched Elizabeth I: The Golden Age, directed by Shekhar Kapur. I’m still interested in that part of history, and I’ve had a nagging suspicion that there’s some significance I should be exploring in the Spanish Armada. It turns out the movie inspired me to discover some interesting clues.
Not much out there would make it better...
It doesn't look that odd, I suppose, though having a number of horsemen and a couple hundred head of cattle along the highway is a bit unusual. What I still laugh about it the two standing there in the red jackets. They are reporters for competing TV stations.
3 Waiting For The Man
And you’ll never walk alone,
Neo is let out of the Matrix to live in the real world along with the rest of the surviving humans not under machine control. He is believed by some to be “the One” who was prophesied to end the war between man and machine and finally bring freedom to all humanity. “Whoa” indeed.
Now, with the flock of birds flying around while you are in your flight, or the seasons changing or be it day or night, all this has been added to the simulator games which has brought it more closer to the realistic world.
5) Go perform somewhere (maybe at one of the improv blues sessions at The Rainbow; maybe at a social event where my fellow musical kinky-dyke friend and I could do a rendition of The Flower Duet from Lakmee (she pronounces it “Lick Me” — Apt. That’s all I’m saying) – conveniently, we each know a different role; maybe at Indie Night at my friend’s studio where she teaches and performs; but SOMEWHERE)
To be fair, you cannot prepare fully for what will hit you, and your
Notice he doesn’t just step out. He asks for Jesus to command him. He’s been in a storm with Jesus before (Matt 8:23-27). Peter knows the power of Jesus’ word – His word is obeyed! So Peter wants a word from Jesus to command him. And the word is powerful to enable that which it commands (Jesus’ word is like that). Peter does the impossible because Jesus commands it.
I was REWARDED when I went shopping afterwards, I assume for doing the right thing - after lying to an honest charity person who had probably been there a long time and been demoralised by the fact no one wanted to help save children - when I ventured into TK Maxx.
- Jes
A few words with the author, Leigh Russell:
Although you can't quite see the stamping on the snaller butterflies, I've used all three of the background stamps that you'll find in this set - one on the orange butterflies, one on the yellow, and the last one on the main image panel in turquoise. The sentiment is also from Pumpkin Seed Sentiments.
And I'll never forget being given the opportunity to visit an organic Irish smallholding specially arranged for me because I had expressed an interest in gardens; discovering what makes a place alive - the people and what they do.
Hartley is having a bad day. First, she finds a condom in her boyfriends locker. While icky under any situation…Hartley isn’t going quite that far with Josh and she doesn’t want to think about the rumors involving the guy she loves and the current president of the Hoover High School Chastity Club.
-Vegan Margarine (Earth balance is perfection)
warmth of water, sinking
And if you would, take the pledge at their website and share the video to let others know and to end the violence. I just joined myself, because I believe God is love, and that if Kony is doing all he has been for the last 25-ish years with the Lord’s name on his banner, he is profaning the Name and is of the devil. Please, in the least, pray for Uganda and its people, that their eyes will be opened to the Word and Jesus Christ and that the child soldiers will be brought home in peace.
Psalm 133
Sketch Archives: You can now find all of the past Waltzingmouse Stamp sketches all in one place. Take a peek right HERE. It’s a wonderful source of inspiration.
You deserve your own
This is usually finished before you are done candying the orange peels.
Kotlinski says he prefers to write music for the Amiga and the Game Boy because previous attempts to make electronic music using a keyboard-and-mouse interface “felt too much like office work.” He believes working directly on the Game Boy allows for a more seamless, uninterrupted compositional experience. “You can be really focused. It’s almost like it doesn’t exist at all. There’s nothing in the way between yourself and the actual song that you’re making.”
Co-valedictorian, school newspaper editor, National Merit Scholar, Glenbard West High School, Glen Ellyn, Illinois
“Bothering me? No, nothing’s bothering me.” I told her defensively.
Ohhhh but I am sure no one has done a post about proposing a bill to be able to drop off your in-laws at a “safe haven” no questions asked. I’m like the kid with the latest sneakers and I can’t walk down my street.
30That well-known name awakens all my woes.
As always I would love to hear any feedback or comments you may have,
I just wanted to take a second to wish you a happy holiday. If you celebrate Passover I hope you’ve been enjoying these last couple of days.
That was her signal to us...she was coping.
Her children arise and call her blessed; her husband also, and he praises her – Proverbs 31:28
“Due to shortage of degree holder engineers, a provision was made in the recruitment rules to allow promotion of diploma holder engineers with outstanding ability and record to the post of executive engineer. In 1996, new recruitment rules were framed wherein the quota of diploma holders was made equal to that of degree holders for promotion to the post of executive engineer. But the department of personnel and training (DOPT) guidelines mandate a review in the rules after every five years, which has not been done for 16 years,” said a degree holder engineer, on the condition of anonymity.
Wish they’d stay there for good
Takes things slow can help clearing my mind. I use it as an opportunity to relax. It’s still photography after all.
However, I’ve since seen a lot of reactions–most of them on the left side of the political spectrum–that are quite angry with Obama for the part of his talk where he said it was a matter that is being worked out in the states–and also, more generally, for not having gone further and tried to push the matter more.
Be on time the day of the wedding. Help the bride get ready. An unofficial bridesmaid duty is often keeping the groomsmen in line during photos (orders to “put down that beer and smile” may be required). Your bride will need different things from you depending on the format of the wedding. I’ve brought out trays of lasagna at a backyard wedding or been formally introduced and joined the first dance at more traditional receptions. Make sure you know what she expects before the events kick off. Once the festivities get going, she’s going to be focused on her groom and her guests and if her bridesmaids know the drill it will keep things running smoothly.
It's a blessing that Mr. Orange and Hornsby get along.
The Topps High Definition line lasted two years (I believe) and was a high-end type card. I don't think I've ever seen a card from the set, so this should be a lot of fun! (It's always fun to try and track down interesting boxes for my group breaks!) Once again, Topps doesn't give odds but the following cards can be found inside boxes of 2001 HD:
A secure leader surrounds himself with talented, skillful people high in character and competence. He is not threatened by them but embraces what they bring to the table, knowing that if everyone puts their best foot forward it benefits the whole team and is not a hindrance or harm to his own personal success but rather contributes to it.
As the first few days went by, nothing happened. I kept smoking as normal, there was no moment of “eugh, these cigarettes are disgusting, what am I doing to myself?” I felt no difference what so ever. Around day 10 I realised I had only been smoking about 8 or 10 a day, not because I had tried to cut down, just because I had smoked less, in fact on the weekend I had 4 cigarettes in total! On the evening of day 12 I went outside for what I knew was going to be my last ever cigarette, I stood there in the cold, lit up, had about 3 drags and thought to myself “what am I doing here, freezing my arse off, sucking on this thing that is doing absolutely nothing for me?” So I put it out and went back inside!
ME: Is it your birthday?
“Things are not as they seem in these antique photo GIFs, and they confirm that the dark side is a silly place indeed.
We trust that you will study what we have said very carefully. Many who will read or hear these words will come to the point of entering upon the Path of Probation in their personal lives. It is also important to realize that many confuse the Path of Probation with the Path of Initiation. This needs to be clearly understood. Probation precedes the Path of Initiation, you see.
We hopped a bus and got dropped off at Kidani Village. I was really impressed with the lobby. I'd never seen it before and I just thought it was unique and interesting. It was so warm and homey to me. We ended up checking into our lunch reservation at Sanaa about a half hour early and only waited a couple of minutes to be seated. The place was packed. I assume because of the horrid weather. Suddenly, I realized that I forgot to request a table right by the big windows overlooking the savannah! Gah! I panicked in my mind! To my relief, we were seated RIGHT by a huge window with nothing blocking our view. Yay!
Ages 2 years and up.
State policymakers will reform Michigan’s antiquated alcohol regulations this year if Gov. Rick Snyder adopts ideas submitted by a liquor reform advisory panel he created months ago.
Paradise – Marble Orchard
4. "Fugazi"
The bad news is; I'm doing all the work myself (yes, I am a little ca-razy).
Booking Through Thursday is a weekly meme that asks you a bookish question. Sometimes the questions are rather easy to answer and other times they are rather difficult and you really have to think about the answer. Kind of like this week's question.
If someone is in the market and new to photography, where do you start?
The first thing I noticed about St. Jerome, who translated The Vulgate, was his smiling eyes. He must have been so happy to be reading God's Word. (Lorica told me that he was known to be grouchy.) And the face of the lion was lovely, Aslan-like. Neither of those endearing features comes through in this little copy.
To finally hear his plans…oh!
Teased, let's say, by heaven's stark
The alpha coefficient was too high; the risk too great. Losing my balance, I plummeted to the darkest recesses of the canyon. I had to release my tenuous grip on the briefcase, so I could pull my chute in my panic; it spilled classified papers all over the floor of the ravine when it exploded on impact. Struggling to free myself from the parachute, I cursed the debacle this mission had become. After finally getting the parachute to release me, I started to ponder over the enigma of where I was. It seemed odd to think that only thirty hours ago I had been sitting in a Starbucks having coffee. But then that man with the formidable mustache had sat down next to me. He made me an offer and I'd run through the gamut of usual excuses, but to no avail. And actually, I couldn't pull off the hypocrisy of not wanting a million bucks. But I played it casual and said, "How ironic, you of all people would need my help.
You know rather quickly from looking at and hearing about these cars, it takes a lot of money to develop a body and engine that can compete in the Indianapolis 500. A lot of money. The Unsers did not start out rich. Swiss immigrants, Louie Unser was a butcher but he had a knack for tinkering with engines. Mechanics was what he loved. They settled near Pikes Peak in Colorado and his sons Louis, Joe and Jerry began building race cars and tried to get a car up to the top of Pikes Peak. Joe was always promising himself he was going to build a car that would make it to the top. The road at the time was dirt. And, he did.
Another PS--fixed the border link, sorry about that, I'm terrible
Whew!, another warm , muggy morning. After chores and breakfast I was on my walk when the rain started misting down, just enough to run me inside and then it stopped. Oh well I have plenty to do inside anyway so might as well get started.
The S is the largest and most advanced phone that Sony’s produced to date, with a 4.3-inch 720p screen (an impressive 341 PPI) a dual-core 1.5Ghz processor, NFC capability with an included set of tags, and a jaw-dropping 12.1 megapixel camera. Unfortunately it’s running Android 2.3, but Sony has (say it with me, kids) promised an Ice Cream Sandwich update some time in the future. The phone has already made its way to the UK and greater Europe, and will be making it here to the US at AT&T’s Xperia Ion, minus the swanky transparent menu buttons. For a review of the British version, check out SlashGear for more info.
i took a piece of clear plastic and stamped the image and words on it and put it on just before i put the outside frame pieces on
Friday night we went on a camp out with the youth group from our church. I wanted to bring something to take along so I made homemade caramel popcorn. Recipe from Brown Eyed baker. It was something fun and tasty and the kids liked it! Then Saturday night I made some halloween cookies for my Children's church class on Sunday. They were chocolate break and bakes with white ghost in the center. I forgot to take pictures on everything, unfortunately b/c i had so much going on! That's pretty much what my weekend consisted of!
Eat immediately or store overnight in the refrigerator and eat in the morning. In a “go” container, this is a great on-the-go breakfast that can be made the night before.
Overall this movie is awesome, definitely better than Battleship (2012), which I posted 2 weeks ago. Rating would be 8/10, funny scene, some fight scene is memorable. Would love to watch second time if got chance and also hope that there is ticket available for IMAX 3D during next week!
Pet Cakes: Rochel R
Through his silence, the Afghan people assume that the president’s priority is withdrawal. This can only weaken their resolve in the face of a persistent Taliban and Al Qaeda.
In Part Three (Chapters 11-15), Johnson shifts her attention to “Making Your Dreams Happen.” Twenty contributors share their own experiences when seeking to achieve that goal. They also share the lessons they learned – and what others can perhaps learn – from those experiences.
Today's recipe is as simple as humanly possible. Just add your chicken and flavorings to the crock pot in the morning, then add some rice 30 - 60 minutes before you want to eat (this depends on whether you are using white or brown rice). Throw some arugula in a bowl with olive oil and salt (the busy mom's "salad") and you're sitting down to dinner just minutes after you walk in the door (or limp in the door, if all that driving gave you sciatica). It's possible to add your rice in the morning, if you don't mind extremely mushy rice for dinner, but it's not an ideal plan.
I added eyes and eye lids to the face and needle sculpted the nose a little more than the pattern called for .
the divine spark,
unread by his heart forever and now
What was the most interesting of all was that she said that her children seem to have become less resistant to meals too.
The potatoes are in, the early tomatoes are tucked away under their tunnel, and I started dozens of squash plants this week (I try to start them on May 1st every year). We've had a cooler than normal spring, so hopefully it's not going to prove too early this year. Fingers crossed that the weather warms up in the next few weeks!
Before I go, I would like to say a word of love to some of the bloggers that I have discovered on this journey that made a positive impression on me and kept me around for as long as I was. There are too many to mention individually, but these were among my regular reads. If you haven't checked them out, you must. I am too lazy/tired to link to them, but a google search works just as well:
I arrive in London in the depth of an icy winter and check into my usual room at Dr Whipnade’s residence. Next morning, I hike across Regent’s Park to the home of Richard E Grant, the actor and substance-sniffer. He arrives at the door in his dressing gown and greets me with a glazed expression on his face.
After several weeks without torching, I felt quite insecure going back to my studio.... it is always the same; after some time without making beads, I think I have completely lost the feeling and knowledge, but it is not true.
You come to rest in the timeless empty void before the universe was born, which the mystics call the ground of being. When you taste the profound freedom that is the inherent nature of that primordial ground, it can seem like the end of the path. Where else could there possibly be for you to go? The very notion of seeking for liberation, for enlightenment, for meaning or purpose seems absurd. The question, “Who am I? ” is answered before it is asked. And the ques tion, “Why am I here?” simply does not arise.
I'm trying not to freak myself out. It could be the wacky weather we're having...cold, then warm, then rainy, then cold, then rainy, then warm, then cold. Ad nauseam. I think it's safe to say she has some arthritis in that joint, she also has arthritis in her hocks. I'm praying it's the weather.
If you ask me (and it's my blog anyway), I think I stayed remarkably calm through all of this. I think I'm pretty reliable in a crisis, even if it means my adrenaline shoots through the roof and keeps me awake for hours afterward, replaying the entire episode. I never imagined I'd think back on the triage concept as often as I do, but maybe I would have made a good EMT after all. Or maybe it was the best training I could have gotten for the life I'm living anyway.
Eight mismatched mittens,
You and I will face painful situations in life that are inescapable. They intrude upon us without invitation. We cannot run from them. They box us in. They are part of living in this fallen world. But they are also orchestrated by a sovereign God. For what reason? To work pearl into us.
style="background: none repeat scroll 0% 0% yellow;" class="goog-spellcheck-word"&amp;amp;amp;gt;lt&amp;amp;amp;lt;/span&amp;amp;amp;gt;;span style="background: none repeat scroll 0% 0% yellow;" class="&amp;amp;amp;lt;span style="background: none repeat scroll 0% 0% yellow;" class="goog-spellcheck-word"&amp;amp;amp;gt;goog&amp;amp;amp;lt;/span&amp;amp;amp;gt;-spellcheck-word"&amp;amp;amp;gt;&amp;amp;amp;lt;span style="background: none repeat scroll 0% 0% yellow;" class="goog-spellcheck-word"&amp;amp;amp;gt;photobucket&amp;amp;amp;lt;/span&amp;amp;amp;gt;&amp;amp;amp;amp;&amp;amp;amp;lt;span style="background: none repeat scroll 0% 0% yellow;" class="goog-spellcheck-word"&amp;amp;amp;gt;lt&amp;amp;amp;lt;/span&amp;amp;amp;gt;;/span&amp;amp;amp;gt;.com/albums/a472/&amp;amp;amp;amp;&amp;amp;amp;lt;span style="background: none repeat scroll 0% 0% yellow;" class="goog-spellcheck-word"&amp;amp;amp;gt;lt&amp;amp;amp;lt;/span&amp;amp;amp;gt;;span style="background: none repeat scroll 0% 0% yellow;" class="&amp;amp;amp;lt;span style="background: none repeat scroll 0% 0% yellow;" class="goog-spellcheck-word"&amp;amp;amp;gt;goog&amp;amp;amp;lt;/span&amp;amp;amp;gt;-spellcheck-word"&amp;amp;amp;gt;&amp;amp;amp;lt;span style="background: none repeat scroll 0% 0% yellow;" class="goog-spellcheck-word"&amp;amp;amp;gt;VeryMerryVintageStyle&amp;amp;amp;lt;/span&amp;amp;amp;gt;&amp;amp;amp;amp;&amp;amp;amp;lt;span style="background: none repeat scroll 0% 0% yellow;" class="goog-spellcheck-word"&amp;amp;amp;gt;lt&amp;amp;amp;lt;/span&amp;amp;amp;gt;;/span&amp;amp;amp;gt;/&amp;amp;amp;amp;&amp;amp;amp;lt;span style="background: none repeat scroll 0% 0% yellow;" class="goog-spellcheck-word"&amp;amp;amp;gt;lt&amp;amp;amp;lt;/span&amp;amp;amp;gt;;span style="background: none repeat scroll 0% 0% yellow;" class="&amp;amp;amp;lt;span style="background: none repeat scroll 0% 0% yellow;" class="goog-spellcheck-word"&amp;amp;amp;gt;goog&amp;amp;amp;lt;/span&amp;amp;amp;gt;-spellcheck-word"&amp;amp;amp;gt;&amp;amp;amp;lt;span style="background: none repeat scroll 0% 0% yellow;" class="goog-spellcheck-word"&amp;amp;amp;gt;sharethelovebutton&amp;amp;amp;lt;/span&amp;amp;amp;gt;&amp;amp;amp;amp;&amp;amp;amp;lt;span style="background: none repeat scroll 0% 0% yellow;" class="goog-spellcheck-word"&amp;amp;amp;gt;lt&amp;amp;amp;lt;/span&amp;amp;amp;gt;;/span&amp;amp;amp;gt;.&amp;amp;amp;amp;&amp;amp;amp;lt;span style="background: none repeat scroll 0% 0% yellow;" class="goog-spellcheck-word"&amp;amp;amp;gt;lt&amp;amp;amp;lt;/span&amp;amp;amp;gt;;span style="background: none repeat scroll 0% 0% yellow;" class="&amp;amp;amp;lt;span style="background: none repeat scroll 0% 0% yellow;" class="goog-spellcheck-word"&amp;amp;amp;gt;goog&amp;amp;amp;lt;/span&amp;amp;amp;gt;-spellcheck-word"&amp;amp;amp;gt;&amp;amp;amp;lt;span style="background: none repeat scroll 0% 0% yellow;" class="goog-spellcheck-word"&amp;amp;amp;gt;jpg&amp;amp;amp;lt;/span&amp;amp;amp;gt;&amp;amp;amp;amp;&amp;amp;amp;lt;span style="background: none repeat scroll 0% 0% yellow;" class="goog-spellcheck-word"&amp;amp;amp;gt;lt&amp;amp;amp;lt;/span&amp;amp;amp;gt;;/span&amp;amp;amp;gt;" /&amp;amp;amp;gt;&amp;amp;amp;amp;&amp;amp;amp;amp;&amp;amp;amp;lt;span style="background: none repeat scroll 0% 0% yellow;" class="goog-spellcheck-word"&amp;amp;amp;gt;lt&amp;amp;amp;lt;/span&amp;amp;amp;gt;;span style="background: none repeat scroll 0% 0% yellow;" class="&amp;amp;amp;lt;span style="background: none repeat scroll 0% 0% yellow;" class="goog-spellcheck-word"&amp;amp;amp;gt;goog&amp;amp;amp;lt;/span&amp;amp;amp;gt;-spellcheck-word"&amp;amp;amp;gt;&amp;amp;amp;lt;span style="background: none repeat scroll 0% 0% yellow;" class="goog-spellcheck-word"&amp;amp;amp;gt;lt&amp;amp;amp;lt;/span&amp;amp;amp;gt;&amp;amp;amp;amp;&amp;amp;amp;lt;span style="background: none repeat scroll 0% 0% yellow;" class="goog-spellcheck-word"&amp;amp;amp;gt;lt&amp;amp;amp;lt;/span&amp;amp;amp;gt;;/span&amp;amp;amp;gt;;/a&amp;amp;amp;gt;&amp;amp;amp;amp;&amp;amp;amp;amp;&amp;amp;amp;lt;span style="background: none repeat scroll 0% 0% yellow;" class="goog-spellcheck-word"&amp;amp;amp;gt;lt&amp;amp;amp;lt;/span&amp;amp;amp;gt;;span style="background: none repeat scroll 0% 0% yellow;" class="&amp;amp;amp;lt;span style="background: none repeat scroll 0% 0% yellow;" class="goog-spellcheck-word"&amp;amp;amp;gt;goog&amp;amp;amp;lt;/span&amp;amp;amp;gt;-spellcheck-word"&amp;amp;amp;gt;&amp;amp;amp;lt;span style="background: none repeat scroll 0% 0% yellow;" class="goog-spellcheck-word"&amp;amp;amp;gt;lt&amp;amp;amp;lt;/span&amp;amp;amp;gt;&amp;amp;amp;amp;&amp;amp;amp;lt;span style="background: none repeat scroll 0% 0% yellow;"
Mikkeller Monks Elixir 10.0%
Why didn’t Scotland Yard want us to know? I can think of two possible reasons. The first is that MI5 and/or the Foreign Office wanted it hushed up. If they suspected that the Russian authorities were somehow behind it, they might have their own reasons for keeping schtum for the moment.
Jessica blushed and ducked her head, missing his small smile of satisfaction. She worked the flower into the braid on her head so she wouldn’t lose it. Disney could have definitely modeled Prince Charming after Ewan.
I don't like the Cardinals...but I can't pick the number 55 over a decent player like Renteria. 11-7 Pinnacle wins the match!
I stand on my feet the whole time I’m at work. The word ‘seat’ is not in our vocabulary. Therefore, when my current work shoes died I needed to replace them with something hardy, comfortable and not too expensive as I plan to leave retail for the corporate world one of these days.
Baking Soda 1 1/2 teaspoons
In prison, you can read whatever you want and attend college for free.
David.Leonardis@ohsp.state.nj.us
As is my nature, I tried to talk myself out of it
I miss you when I’m scared that I’m not going to find anyone. I miss the woman who would say to me – of course you will find someone. You are special, and you will find someone who will love you in the way that you deserve. I miss the woman who really believed that a love that was strong enough to overcome almost everything was possible. That woman didn’t have hardly any role models to show her it was true, but she somehow believed she was going to be the exception. That he was going to be the exception – the man who wouldn’t let her down, no matter what.
From the Tangueros . .
6. Direct dividends from corporations that do not have a presence in New Jersey will be taxed at a rate of 50% of margin after federal taxes. Owners of stock of those corporations will be liable for 50% of their profits after federal tax. NOTE: Retirement accounts such as IRA and 401-K are excluded from this provision.
The upside of second job syndrome is that you can overcome budget shortfalls by putting in extra hours and you can support those activities and purchases that won’t fit into your regular budget. As an example: last summer I realized that I was facing multiple bridal showers, baby showers, birthdays and family gatherings. Picking up a second job meant that I neither had to spend down my (miniscule) savings, nor pretend I had contracted mono in order to stay home. That extra job made a financially challenging summer a manageable (and less stressful) one.
3/8-inch ribbon
The best way to learn the procedure is under the guidance of an AT teacher. While performing the movements it is very important to maintain a proper relationship between the neck, the head and the back as well as the appropriate level of muscular tension. To judge this subjectively is much more difficult than may be imagined: our kinaesthetic sense is frequently deceptive after years of incorrect use. It is for this reason that the guidance of an AT teacher is necessary — at least initially.
That’s what I’m going to call it, getting Put Down. “Captain, the crew has all been Put Down.” “Thanks Ruby.”
For the week:
Have you been to my kitchen?
Gender : FEMALE
Ervin is a towering figure in the North Carolina Democracy, and I can see where Price would find political and ideological comfort in adopting a position on the lacrosse case that traces its ideological roots to a belief of Ervin’s—even if most people now consider Ervin’s approach to civil rights matters wholly wrong.
Serve and enjoy!
After I became a Christian I had a tonne of questions. I think we all did. I wanted them immediately answered. I never felt that I was getting the answers that I wanted or were necessarily accurate. These two books answered many of my questions. Where they couldn't answer my exact questions they enabled me to let go and trust God. I may not have all the answers and others smarter than I may not have the answers, but God has the answers. These book encouraged me to trust that alone. That I didn't need the answers to believe. God was worth more than my little questions. Sometimes I still struggle with trust issues and let those lingering questions take over, but then I remember the God that redeemed me and restored me and I trust.
Munroe Falls
Brooklyn Bridge Park Corporation board approved $66.5 million in funding from the City, which includes the (fully-restored) funding commitment secured in Senator Daniel Squadron's and Assemblymember Millman's agreement with the City last summer, and a $40 million donation for recreation in the park.
We hadn’t been out for dinner with most excellent friends R & T for some time, and given T was about to do his Dive with the Sharks at the Melbourne Aquarium (a gift from his lovely other half – R) – we thought that – if he survived, we should go out for dinner.
place and thing your name, you answer to them
00000001) There is not a lick of carpeting on the level of our house that contains the laundry room. Cleaning up a flood on a hard tile floor is one thing, but quite another (overturned) kettle of fish when carpet is involved (and by “involved”, I mean mold and its accompanying odor).
So, VOM, and the locals have figured out a way to tidy this mess up and make it all go away, and appear that there “really never was any suspicion that an iconic religious leader such as Tom White could commit such a heinous crime. Convenient for the “ministry” perhaps, and convenient for the city of Bartlesville, and sparing of Tom’s widow and family, but…..where is the real truth in all this? I think it got buried with Tom White.
This is all generally overlooked, which is a shame because it seems pretty important.
March 20 TBA, Springfield MO
The ghost of St Cuthbert is said to haunt the island, being seen on the craggy rocks down by the shore, He has also been seen on a stone slab inside the ruin of the old Priory. He is also allegedly responsible for what are known as “Cuddy’s beads.” On dark and stormy nights the sound of his hammering can be heard as he chips away at stone to make the
The third annual Jessica and Kelli Uhl Memorial Fundraiser will be held on July 23, 2011, from 7pm to midnight at the KC Hall in Collinsville, Illinois. A $20 donation gets you dinner, dancing, and access to silent auctions, raffles and other door prizes. So far we've gotten donations of St. Louis Cardinal baseball tickets, autographed sports memorabilia, handmade quilts, wine baskets, overnight accomodations, and we hope to have more great prizes and services donated by local merchants.
I’m definitely going. And dragging poor Jeremiah with me, although he’s wonderfully supportive and has actually gone to Stix ‘n’ Stitches, my local yarn shop down in Montclair, NJ, with me (he fell asleep on Sheila’s couch, though). So I expect to meet some of you, right? And please, don’t give me that “I saw you but I was afraid to approach you.” Nonsense. My friends think I’m likeable, so don’t fear the reaper, OK?
And the song, by Phil Oakey called Together In Electric Dreams, is quite awesome. It’s now a favourite song for me. Just wondered why I never have heard it on the radio before (as my favourite radio station plays songs from 60s – late 80s/early 90s). Goes well with the whole feel and energy (no pun intended) of the advert : )
Rick Ross – MMG The World is Ours
Dual wearing style with 3rd generation Jabra Eargel and flexible earhook
The winners of the US AARP’s Best Employers for Workers over 50 Awards have just been announced.
I had a strange realisation too regarding the ritual of doing a task again and again, be it meditation, morning pages, songwriting, guitar playing, cooking, anything. When you start writing songs, every one of them seems a unique and separate entity. You pay inordinate amounts of attention to every detail and the songs themselves do not always flow out of you because you are still battling with a degree of perfectionism.
Special features include: “An inside look at Sea Wolf” and B-roll footage. (Entertainment One)
So, maybe I need to mix in a salad or two into my day. And cut out the cheeses. And let go of the lattes. And run a few extra miles on my shorter run days.
Relationship minus intimacy equals religion
but Dick and Judy are pretty special neighbors!
It was hot in the Czech Republic. Super hot. So we put our kids in a fountain.
I saw something a week ago that captured my heart and hasn't left my mind. It's a bold prayer that verbalizes THE reason more of us don't step forward into foster care and adoption. We forget who we are. Read this that was posted by a friend who is a mother in the beginning stages of foster care...
So this playlist has songs that I feel are really easy to get into. It's aimed at people who have never tried the genre much or at all. Most of the songs are melodic, atmospheric, folk, and post-black metal... rather than raw, depressive, extreme, etc. If you're a fan of black metal you probably have all of these with the exception of Azeroth, an unknown Russian melodic black metal band (who you should definitely check out - I have the discography on this blog). Or, if you just want to hear a good playlist.
Top a warm tortilla with the meat mixture, and garnish with cheese, onions and lettuce. This amount will serve 3-4 people, depending on how hungry they are. When I am serving 6, I double the amount, but with a hungry teenage boy it's not quite enough anymore!!
"WHOA! Greeeaaat! That's a lovely show, that is, that . . . er . . . "
Three of the four seem to think they would be allowed to attend a lecture in their nocturnal apparel. But 22-year-old Eoghan Desmond from Cork (along with your scribe) isn’t so sure.
I’ll do my best to improve the blog in the upcoming week or so. If you ever have any tips on what could be improved, please do send me a message and I’ll try to do my best to give you the most interesting content as available!
I’ve been asked to say a few words about the importance of Jewish activism against the Occupation. Whether in the U.S., Israel or elsewhere, I think every shred of it matters. It’s the embodiment of an ethical Judaism, of “that which is hateful to you, do not to others.” It is the rejection of an idolatrous version of Israel and of the soil. It is a recognition that history is not Jewish alone. It is a critical, educative response to what has been claimed as “Israel’s right to exist”–at any cost and on any terms, including a blindered self-destructiveness.
Loop 2 - 9 miles - Robin D stayed with me. Woman is a rock of support. I run way slower than her, but she has run by my side many times when I needed someone. The temps were warming to about the mid 40s and things felt nice, BUT a race was starting right as we started this loop... so you know we got caught up in that, and I pushed a few miles at a pace a bit faster than planned, but things were still fine. We took a few walk breaks this loop, much like I will in the ultra - particularly on wobbly bridges and any hills.
But, in reality, the tombstone read 'meal man' rather than 'mean man', which referred to Scroggie's job as a successful corn merchant. The real Ebeneezer was well-known for his generous nature and often enjoyed a good party.
Do I hate that it is pink? Yes. Do I hate that it is called OrganizeHER? Yes. But it works, and it's $7 for an entire year. Enough space for lunches for kids (buy/make), dinner for family, activities, extras. Jon and I plan it out on the weekend so we can get groceries and know who has to cover what. This week is a slow week with Jon gone and we're trying to clean out the fridge before we go out of town.
That reminds me of the time that a middle-aged guy came up to me with a vague request for mood music. After a couple failed attempts to find what I thought he was looking for, Windham Hill-type music or cool jazz was what everyone else wanted, he leaned in close to me and murmured, "Mood music, you know, like for sex?" More than a little put off, and being the snarky little music snob I was, I marched over to the compilations section and put an Excursions in Ambience volume in his hands nodding portentously. Sure I was messing with him, but in all honesty, I think Seefeel, Air, and Spacetime Continuum provide a great soundtrack for doing it.
I am developing muscles that I never knew existed. Especially those side abs. No wonder most of the horsey girls have such great legs and figures.
I don’t wanna waste the weekend
I started off with a Watermelon Martini!
Yesterday was the first day I had time to paint after 2 months of directing camp, travel and summer activities. I was so anxious to start and am still anxious to paint the 7 other ideas that have been floating around in the back of my mind!
Happy Father's Day, honey. We love you completely, totally, and utterly. Thanks for enduring multiple humiliations on behalf of those who love you. There will be more to come.
We’re going to time travel a little bit, back to when my online dating shenanigans began.
Let me just say I'm not one for fake fruit on a table. I think my aversion to fake fruit comes from being a child in someone's home (my mom never had fake fruit) and picking up a jucy apple only to realize it was fake. It was a real let down for me. I always thought "why put fruit on the table if you can't eat it?"
“It was the best of times, it was the worst of times.” A Tale of Two Cities (Charles Dickens)
Treasury Holdings is reportedly one of NAMA’s Top 10 developers and REO’s main asset, the Battersea Power Station site in London is likely to be one of NAMA’s most valuable properties (the Dundrum Shopping Centre might just about be the most valuable on paper today but that will change as Battersea is developed, having secured full planning permission at national government level earlier this year).
What a picture God is placing before me,it’s truly amazing the magnitutde of our God.Just as God took Moses and the children of Israel through the red sea on dry ground,I’m being shown another picture. The one where Pharaoh and all of his men was washed up on the seashore,well so is drug addition,sex addition,homosexuality,lust,panic attacks,child molestion, all of the things that can bind us up so tight. Jesus Christ defeated each and everyone so that we can enjoy his love,peace and joy! But there is something you have to do,”You Must Be Born Again”! There is no way around the love and protection of almighty God. Jesus Christ has made it so easy,just call on him confess your sins,ask for forgiveness and walk with him. All of the things you’re trying to do now to please God does not work,because your sins stand between you and God. Jesus Christ is the sin eraser,and he and only he,can present you to God whole. Jesus Christ the Holy,Precious Lamb of God is still the “only way” to God. And that peace,joy and freedom you so desire. Oh you may fool your friends and family,but you cannot hide from the watchful eyes of almighty God! He sees,He knows and He cares for you deeply! I tell you it’s a wonderful thing walking in freedom,you can fake it but it’s not the same! Jesus Christ is ready and willing to set you free because he has killed the things that have you bound up,satan just makes you think he’s bad,he makes you think you can never quit! Remember now he is the liar and the Father of lies,all lies come from him and through him,and the enemy (Flesh) within you is another problem,but get this “ant nothing to hard for God”! All of the things that Jesus has defeated can drop off and you will never go back,but it’s only through Jesus Christ. I tell you I’m free and loving it! O I use to be bound up and I was having a good time or so I thought,there is nothing to be compared to the time I’m having in Christ, I’m in love with my Saviour for real! Jesus has loosed me and now he’s using me to help you get free,the messages God gives me ant for everybody,just the chosen few. Have you ever left a Church service and felt like umph, Pastor must be going through something I didn’t get nuttin out of service,well it was not for you. That’s why we can sit through the same service and hear a whole different word,God planned it that way.Why ? Because he alone knows exactly what each of us needs and he knows how to reach you. “Whew” what a word from the Lord,it’s a blessing to me and I know it will bless the chosen.
A tip. When you go out, you know that the gang stalkers will be all around you. Well, I tell you to do this, but I don’t always follow my own advise. If you’re new to gang stalking, you should watch the gang stalkers, because you’re in the learning stage of gang stalking and have to learn how they work. But if you’re an old-timer, the best thing to do is ignore them, ignore them, ignore them, ignore them, ignore them. They always do the same damn thing. Pay absolutely no attention to them. They love the attention you give them. They live for it. When you go out, keep saying to yourself “ignore them, ignore them, ignore them” over and over. That’s what I been doing lately, and it’s working better for me. I have a hard time keeping my mouth shut. So if it’s working for me, I’m sure it’ll work for you. Just make-believe they’re part of the wall. Make believe they don’t exist. Tell yourself there’s nothing there. And keep walking. They’ll hate it! You paid no attention to the stars. And if you feel yourself losing your temper, just get away quickly. Don’t stay around where they are. I know how hard it is not to smack them. Just control yourself whatever you do. When you get home, you can throw something at the wall. Always stay calm. They want you to act up so they can call the police on you and make up lies about you.
Funny that a no-good bum but ego-maniacal character like Geoffrey Carroll could see this much.
Most recently, I created an old gate from scrap wood to brighten up the fireplace area. Because the scale of the fireplace is so large, equally over sized accessories make filling up the space a lot of fun!
When you promised to love me!
I get an excited pang
Before you stumble down to one of the many clubs, such as Pacha, which we CONQUERED last time out, May 24th-28th are the dates…I’ll have shots waitin for you when you get there!!
2. Sift the flour, two tablespoons sugar, the baking powder, and salt into the bowl of an electric mixer fitted with the paddle attachment. Blend in the butter on low speed and mix until the butter is the size of peas. Combine the eggs and heavy cream and, with the mixer still on low, add to the flour and butter mixture. Mix until just blended.
I'm surrounded by restaurants in Los Feliz (and the nearby neighborhoods), but sometimes nothing hits that sweet spot of casual, easy, anonymous, delicious. Enter Atwater Crossing Kitchen. Order your food at the counter, then hang out undisturbed in their summery courtyard dining area.
You say, “Well, what’s this mean, Michael?” So often you will invoke me or call me, and I am glad you do, and I mean all of you. But never think that you cannot also come—as most of you do in one way or another, during your time of sleep or dream—and be with us increasingly as you are ascending and shifting dimensions. This is going to be clearer to you.
Brewed: 01-21-2008
5. An Everyday Consumption Song
People, I think it's important you learn from my mistakes.
Now that I've got my emotions out of the way, I think I'll go watch Pamela Anderson make a fool of herself.
This trip was so short I just hopped in the car and went. Kelley and the girls stayed in Raleigh as I didn't want to have the kids in the car for 8 hours when the duration of our stay in Greenville was only about 25 hours total. That meant Sunday morning was spent out on the back deck and in the garden with my mom, and that's a treat that happens very rarely anymore.
With this article, I hope to find insight into the question that has plagued me since childhood.
Purpose was involved for several months ~ what occurred so effortlessly 3 years previous was not going to be so easy this time. Repeated non success led to disappointment, and disappointment led to frustration. Perhaps there is magic in the month of August … magic that Divinely and mysteriously combined that school girl’s dreams with hope, and then that hope into reality. Reality was confirmed and then anticipation immediately hit the calendars for the first week of May…nearly the exact same day that the older sibling had been due to arrive. As the pages of the calendar began to turn, so did the Momma’s stomach, limiting the items on the menu, and once again not able to even tolerate the aroma of brewing coffee. Necessary changes were made without much grumble, and the family of three (plus dog) adjusted. By early December, ultrasound photos revealed the hidden secret of gender and all were thrilled beyond words to officially refer to the ever-growing baby belly as Lillie. Along with her big brother Cole, Lillie had gifts under the Christmas tree, and was quite noticeable in the annual holiday family photo. The New Year started and with it came some concern from Momma’s doctor which sent her to bed for a couple of weeks. Those weeks of rest proved to be helpful, but only temporarily. As spring dropped hints of its existence throughout our very mild winter, Kim’s body began to show signs of early dilation and possible pre-term labor. Once again, orders were made to rest and do very little … Prayers were prayed, food was brought in, and child care was provided during those long weeks of caution. For all of this and more, we are so appreciative! The phrase ‘full-term’ finally made its way into our vocabulary and the little momma received professional permission to emerge from her couch. A slow but deliberate re-entry into activity began to take place, as well as ‘practice’ contractions and pressure. Substantial dilation secretly moved in on the scene and was detected and announced by the attending physician during the final weekly visit. A suggestion was made to have all bags packed and to expect a quick trip to the hospital before the scheduled day of surgery. A fun-filled weekend, including movie night with popcorn and milkshakes, a family picnic on Saturday, and kickball in the park ended with timely contractions and extreme discomfort during the wee hours of Sunday. A call to the doctor in charge during those sleepy hours instructed the waiting parents to arrive in Annapolis as soon as possible for an exam, at which time the number 8 seemed to boost workers into sudden activity. The preferred C-section delivery was prepped, as was the patient, and at 5:50 am on Sunday, April 29, 2012, Lillianne Hope was born.
8 Cluster & Eno* - Für Luise 5:01
Proverbs 15:1
What I’m saying is, if you have a law, enforce it. I believe we have an entire government branch for that. Don’t over-complicate things with more words and more rules to perfectly specify what’s already quite plain!
1 squirmings
At root, I'm *afraid* when I have something to lose, right? The faculty and staff (and fellow students) at Jesuit could, at worst, kill me. Fuck 'em. They were welcome to try that but I knew they didn't have the WILL to go that far. For anything less than that, I cite Eleanor Roosevelt: No one can make you feel inferior without your consent. I did not give those fuckers my consent and they knew it. It was a five-year Mexican standoff. (School was 8th-12th grades.) Severally and individually, they expended a great deal of energy trying to demean and break me. I'm still standing, you fucks! Eat me!
So because it's running late, i took a quick photo and my camera ran out of battery..so that's the only shot i had. And I am now posting this at 11:52..pm.. LOL!
What is your favorite budget-friendly shower gel? Do you have a mascara stash that’s getting out of hand? Which mascara would you like to see me review next?
Recipe for the eggplant here. It seemed odd - you fried the eggplant without the crumbs and sprinkled crumbs over the top. But it was delicious! I reduced the recipe - I only used one eggplant because it is not a fav of the baby beechers. I like my eggplant parm nice and soft - it had a roasted flavor even though it wasn't baked in the oven.
I am proud of several things. I got involved with the 'Dress a Girl around the World' project and was really pleased to be asked to be the UK co-ordinator. A dress I made ended up being worn by a girl in Malawi. Amazing!
78. Been a passenger on a motorcycle
A report on the Irene camp states that, out of a population of 1325 detainees, 154 were ill and 20 had died during the previous week. Still this camp had only one doctor and no hospital.
Now all other sources state the shoulder boards for the Uhlanen were coloured in order of seniority (just like the battalions within a regiment of Landwehr infantry). Now since the Brandenburg Uhlanen were the Third regiment in line, theirs would be yellow and in the end that is what I went for.
I will be house-sitting (and dog-sitting) through the weekend, then taking off on Monday or Tuesday, heading to Ohio. Not much photography happening this week so here's some from the past.
Klaus Briest - Bass
Nothing in my house is safe. If it's plush, soft, or gives off just the slightest hint of comfort, Davinci steals it. I'll never forget one day I decided to re-organize our linen closet. I placed two extra pillows on the floor for no more than two seconds and he claimed them. One second I placed them on the floor at the foot of one of my dressers, turned around to fold a sheet, turned around again and saw Dacinvi sprawled out on the pillows passed out. End of story.
When I get upstairs, I pretend like I can't find them. "Where's that little girl with the yummy fingers? Under this pillow? Maybe those girls are hiding in the drawer!" (you get the idea).
It’s been an education looking back at the prints though. Were Dearest and I really that slim? Was my hair once free of grey? Did I honestly wear shorts that…well…short – and revealing? Were Eldest and Youngest once so young?
They are a sweet bread but not too sweet. Not close to a muffin, more like a sweet roll. They usually have spice in the batter and fruits, with a glaze over the top. They also have a cross on the top and are traditionally served during Easter on Good Friday. According to Wikipedia they may even pre-date Christ although the first recorded use of the term Hot Cross Bun was in 1733!!!! I get to make something that’s been passed along since then, wow!
The 911 GT3 is Porsche’s first hybrid racer and the precursor to the Porsche 918 Spyder Hybrid production car, which will launch in 2012. Detlev Von Platen, CEO of Porsche North America, says the flywheel technology used in both of the cars represents the future of Porsche.
Through a field of daisies and spring air
- rise too low
99ANGER plays Punk/hardcore/emo/indi.
So we're 6 days into November and still no recap. Sorry.
Sounds like it’s worth checking out. Sin City Partys will be there January 31st to get the full affect.
We go undercover
The cake had to satisfy all the criterions… have chocolate without being too chocolaty, have some sort of nut without being pronounced, no fruits, had to be a layer cake etc etc…S-I-G-H !!
Your body
Flung into car
Marketing and Sales Speaker/Consultant/Author
